Well, for twelve she can draw pretty good
t༼ຈل͜ຈ༽ށ 
But we already know the plot twist :C
sleight*
Am I the only one who think that this guy is amazing?
[Et tu, Dole?](http://imgur.com/abua947)
Yes! Last year, 8 million Canadians watched it. (Out of a population of about 35 million, so approximately 20-25% of the country)
After buying just one meal and using it to feed the whole crowd!  It's a miracle!  Of course, that would ruin the restaurant's business.  So maybe not.
Ah I see the edit now, my mistake. 
Did you even have to use your A.K.?
&gt;one short, formulaic war  The beauty of TW is that it doesn't have to go that way.
To go from nothing to this in ~3 months is awesome. Good work. I don't mean to make you feel bad about anything and my first comment might not have been worded well. What I'm trying to communicate is that with game design (as well as many other things) it pays off to think pretty deeply about what people will get out of what you're sharing with them. For instance, showing the entire end game in a trailer leaves someone with no reason to actually play your game. You've robbed them of that experience, of beating the skeleton.   Just food for thought. Keep it up. Everyone starts somewhere and you'll only get better.
North of Havana Cigars 55 State Street, North Haven, CT 06473
Wait, we don't play CS:S? Well, fuck you, too.
I could be wrong, but that seems a bit too in-depth for a nine year old to interpret. Granted, I haven't played the game, but unless it shows the child actually being beaten by its mother, I doubt she really "gets" it. Even if she does, I would venture to say that the steps taken, such as the talk before hand, largely circumvent the issue of lasting trauma.
I'm chilean and I don't like Barcelona, and I think that Alexis Sánchez is really overrated, but damnit I still wish him to do well.  I'm guessing something similar is at hand here...
This picture is amazing! I used to live up there and this defiantly brought back some good memories. Thank you for posting it!
Mastering skills
males should learn to not be so sensitive, its just jokes on the internet
The only way of obtaining any sort flight buff is to go through the Pilot quest chain. Although it is not the true flight buff its the closest you can get without completing the Astronaut quest chain and taking part in one of the Spacewalking quests.
He's talking about a different show on BET.
cmon!!!
You have problems.
Ive had one tdy in all my years..  Enjoy it.
*:hides face in hands:*  *:runs away embarrassed:*
&lt;--- INTJ film guy. Did some youtube stuff in the past. Acting here and there through college. I'd say you absolutely come off as INTJ, and a lot of that comes from the way you speak, both linguistics and content. You've just tapped into your Se, which is most likely what's throwing people off.
[Nananananananananananana — Nacho Monreal! Monreal! Nacho Monreal!](http://youtu.be/IeqtAB1WgEw?t=1m)
It could be the gun violence recently.  
shopped
mostly 4s cause well that's what you gotta run but mine was a 5s that puffed. Definitely bump that cut off up 3.0 is too low. I set my cars at 3.4 and aircraft stuff at 3.6
Kill myself? Why should i kill myself and miss trolling dip shits like you. Never. I may be a fucking idiot to you but there a few people who are alive today who would say other wise. Children watch those around them and try to mold themselves to what they see. If the parents are shit the kids most likely will be too. If the parents care and the kid see that then they might grow up good. See i know people who came from very good homes who ODed on drugs because they were stupid. And i know some people who came from parents, who havent ODed yet because they dont have the money, who turned out great. Humans are a virus on this planet. Some are good.... Most are bad. Thats life. *puts on sunglasses* .... Deal with it. 
debating the wrong word being used is pointless? I'd say using a word with the correct meaning to your debate topic is quite important
So how did the Bandolier of Color guy do his belt?
how many batteries did you burn through?
I have a video of this same draugr hanging from that same door xD I even tried shooting him with firebolts but he was hardly stuck up there with his legs
I wonder if any of my townsfolk found their way to you, I changed the catch phrase of one resident to that then they all started to say it.
I have scumbag shower where I go to collage at. One minute it's warm and the next it's super hot. I feel you bro, I feel you.
Depends on what you consider raiding.
If he charges in by himself and almost dies before the rest of the party even gets there then he deserves to die and you should let him continue dying. If I were in the group I'd talk to him and get him to work together with the party. The entrance to combat is some of the most fun, if you have a sneaky person to tell you what to expect. Maybe you could set up a situation where they have some time to think about a plan of action, and maybe he'll see what everyone else is doing and not do something to get himself killed.
My crush hugging me before she leaves.  I swear it's probably the only reason I even go to school.
That's the one thing I might change. I may make a 16GB RAM Drive in the future, but more than likely, I'll just go ahead and sell the second kit, since I really don't need it. And it was a Christmas present for myself, the only reason I'm posting it now is because I had issues originally, so I don't go blowing this kind of money for no reason.  Thanks though!
WHAT!?  Talk about childhood shattering comments.
Thank you for not turning this into a Sexy*Pyramid Head! Great work. 
Very nice. Best I've seen since browsing mcpublic.
I love my new flair.
It's only a step from Marklar
In another thread, yes. Weird that it would come up here, as this doesn't really have anything to do with that.
BOOM!  http://data.whicdn.com/images/17325267/tumblr_liux0mK9uw1qixleeo1_400_thumb.gif
He's not making good life choices. If we had "more guys like this," we'd have fewer guys like that. If you follow me.
Scrolling through this post gives me a nostalgia boner.
the problem is these polls tend to be crap.  [watch this, the relevant part is a bit far in, but it shows you how divisive these polls are made.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=r9dqNTTdYKY)  i really wish people on /r/atheism would watch this, they might stop falling for the same shit over and over.
Never test scripts like this in production. You absolutely will wreck something one day, it's not a matter of "if", it's a matter of "when". Make your boss cough up whatever you need in order to test.  Hell, if you have to, set up a few VM's on your workstation to do this job with virtual drives.
It hangs like the sleeve of a wizard. 
And a genius to boot!
"We're top flight security of the world Craig!!"
I'll send you a requesrt tommorow due to it being midnight here
well I cant colourize, [but I can do this](http://postimage.org/image/uoq62sj15/full/)
Sorry, I'll keep that in mind.
excellent write up good sir! lots of good info.
well arentcha just like the coolest smartest specialest person everrrrrrr. are it you able to believe it yet?
Nash needs to bury 2+ goals tonight. He's hungry he's got it in him. 
yea, just a bit.
The logistics of having to filter who can and can't be parents would be nightmarish. Also its a very dangerous road to go down, who would decide who is appropriate to be a parent? What would give a group the right to have this kind of influence? Its a form of thought that is far too close to Eugenics IMO
I cannot fucking stand listening to black people argue with each other.  'Fuck nigger nigger stand up nigger fuck nigger nigger'.. Just wears on your ears after a few minutes. 
Hmm.  I am curious as to why you have chosen not to take stimulants, as they are the most prescribed meds because of their success.  But hey, your choice, no worries if you wish not to disclose why.  There are other non-stimulants you can use by the way--"Delivered from Distraction" lists a bunch, I can get that for you when I'm home.  **Wellbutrin is an option though--it's usually for depression but because it is also a norepinephrine reuptake inhibitor, it can be used off-label for ADHD.**  I was prescribed it for awhile in conjunction with Concerta (on Adderall now).  As for handling laziness and procrastination, what have you tried?  Do you make lists of tasks?  Do you have a [calendar](http://i.imgur.com/SGf2j.jpg) of some sort to help you plan things? See [comments on photo from r/ADHD here](http://www.reddit.com/r/ADHD/comments/169jry/my_wardrobe_closet_doubles_as_a_mirror_now_i/)  Do you drink caffeine at all?  What about exercise?  If you live a sedentary lifestyle, that will not help in the long run, trust me.  Exercise helps get some dopamine going, but naturally.  Hope that is maybe a start?
"I swear by my life and my love of it, that I shall never live for the sake of another man, nor ask another man to live for the sake of mine."  The Striker's Oath
depends how much
It's a doggy rubik's cube! Just undo the superflip.
The irony here is that if the US did go to war with China, they'd have to borrow money from China to do it.
Will give you 10 TF2 keys for Dungeon Defenders collection, if you have it  edit: TF2 keys
[Read this thread please.](http://na.leagueoflegends.com/board/showthread.php?t=18374&amp;highlight=exclusive) I'm not mad that Riot wanted to bring Goth Annie into the store, but when you make a statement saying **exclusive** in a business situation that statement becomes a promise.   Riot's choice to bring the skin into the store was against a promise they made. That's that, it sucks for everyone because it's a firestorm.
Very excitement for this, I played iron and wine during my wedding 2 months ago
Whenever I DM I do points buy for character stats so I can help players keep it even and fair.  
It costed you 36 thousand dollars for a friend.... I would have been your friend for half that. 
1337
I believe having two stalkers near their base and kiting them all the way to yours should soften up the scv count by the time they get there
I'm gonna try to pick my buddy up from work and head up there. 
I would be happy to. PM me.
http://m.espn.go.com/soccer/story?storyId=1320840
what?
i am pretty sure he is having a stroke
Perhaps the EMP Grenade? If only it had an effect on vehicles...
Do you mean you're watching the films that feature Paulie Shore, or that the two of you are having a shitty movie night? For the former, the Guinness Book of Records holds that the most times any individual has sat through the same Paulie Shore movie is 3.27, so aim for the stars, my friend, and shoot for 3.3. For the latter, I recommend zero. Shore is a terrible houseguest (he upper-deckered both my toilets and my fridge) and tends to talk on his phone during films. I hope this helps!
ohhh thx
This blurb for Gangs of New York had me laughing:  &gt; The actor got a little too into things though when he was diagnosed with pneumonia after refusing to wear a toasty modern coat because it wasn’t in keeping with the period.  For those that know the background of his preparation, DDL also turned to listening to Eminem's discography throughout the shoot, to keep him in an aggressive and ill-tempered mood. Apparently rap music and headphones were around a lot longer than I thought...
Yeah, but your chances of surviving that are a whole lot higher in a car.
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=L-LyFMCIpok
Portal is not a shooter. first person, yes. but not a shooter.  A first person shooter is any game where you shoot things in first person. 
What is this from?
I think Milanoo is just trying to kiss her butt because years ago she made a video about how Milanoo is a scam.  I've heard that Milanoo is like Russian Roulette. Some people actually get what they want while others get nothing or have their items go horribly wrong. The merchandise received that has been labeled as "good" from customers is probably misguided opinions or they're being to lenient. Like if it matches the picture, people are satisfied, but the fabric and details might actually be pretty bad. I refuse to believe they have changed for the better because it's going to take A LOT to improve their image after all the trouble they've caused.  There are so many safer options, like buying from trusted sites, handmaking things, or buying secondhand. 
needs more ~~turtleneck~~ tactical turtleneck.
Yep! Especially when I'm sneaking a roommates leftover cupcakes..
Worthlessraper is what I call him.
YOU!!! I WAS DONE WITH THIS JOKE THREE YEARS AGO!! YOU KILLED MY WINNING STREAK!!
So you mean in a heart transplant surgery they DON'T break all of the ribs with a hammer, take out both lungs, sever the blood vessels of the failing heart without connecting them to anything, drop the donor heart into the chest cavity without attaching it to anything, throw various things on the floor, and stab the patient while laughing maniacally all without wearing any gloves?  Who would've guessed?! :)
And the $100 annual fee for using Office.
I can answer, you don't have to...
Originally submitted [here](/r/IAmA/comments/tko8c/iama_request_rashida_jones/) by user [GreenCristina](/u/GreenCristina).
Same with she found a love
I agree that WinRT needs an overhaul (both in 'marketing' and in 'interface') if it's going to survive: consumers have little incentive to buy a Windows-oriented device if it doesn't actually *run* all their Windows-based programs.  But I'm a bit mystified by one of his comments further down where says it's "bad news" for Windows 8 as a whole. Sure, the image isn't a great one right now, but once the Surface Pro is out, surely things will be 'normalised' a bit.
I just installed an Aprilaire 500 at my house. With mostly good but mixed results. Install took me way longer then I expected it quickly brought my relative humidity from 5% when I first got the humidistat going to about 25%. I haven't been able to get it over 28% in my house and if I turn on the extended blower option my blower never turns off. My house is 3000 sqft so perhaps I should have gotten a bigger model.
la dada da da da da da da dada da
Damn it, how many times do I have to tell you. They were call girls, they're not Hookers unless they are dead. Get with the program.
But that's only if Britain is nuked, if the US is nuked, we colonize them again.  Weather they like it or not.
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=7ODn0dqZ2Ew
Pawn Stars is fake, family friend went there because she liked the hsow and hoped to get an autograph, waited in a line of 300 people (obviously meaning the store would also be full and not like it is portrayed when they are filming) and when she finally got into the store she was told the people in the show only come in when they are filming.
Some of them are real, My ex girlfriends parents were spiritualists and they could do that stuff.
The description says nothing about the actual death needing to be in the video. It's not just about watching the people in their final moments... it's also about seeing the accidents that cause these deaths.  But if you feel like it doesn't belong here, just downvote it. The mods will surely remove it if they agree with you.
That thermite was anywhere in or around the WTC on 9/11, or that thermite is even used in controlled demolition.  And that WTC7 was a controlled demolition ordered by the Larry Silverstein. You know, because Jews control that sort of thing.
I was there. The size of the "deal" was grossly exaggerated by a minority.
I agree that a company has to protect itself.  But the original picture didn't include the customer's name or any indication that it was Applebees.  I think it could have been handled differently without anyone getting fired.  I'm not really boycotting, I just don't go to Applebees because the food kinda sucks.  I do tend to have issues with most nationwide chains and try to support small/local businesses as much as possible.  
My guess is they're going to do the east coast in late spring or summer how they did it last year - just a few stops with several nights at each.
A•200 G•1 A•2000 T•1 H•1 A•20,000
Hey, good luck on the spawner, I have 4 layers for one chunk and its already way too much for one person. Once that blaze spawner is finished, you'll get rates like CRAZY. 2x that if its a double spawner trap 
wailing fungus!
My point is that the new ladder system doesn't really change matchmaking in any significant way, but it's important because it makes it SEEM like it is.  Division series FEEL more important, because you can advance a tier - even though in reality you're matchmaking Elo is being calculated exactly the same way as before.  The game has spikes of "important" and "unimportant" games, instead of every round played seeming like an endless soup of similar experiences.
yes you are moving on.
I hope you realize this is an AMA request, not the actual ama lol
Romancing the stone.
Anything that has a first person perspective, and a gun. Probably hundreds.  Wouldn't call Portal a shooter. It's a puzzle game. 
&gt;[Start here: How do I jailbreak my device on iOS 5.1.1 or iOS 6.0/6.0.1?](http://www.jailbreakqa.com/questions/119673/jailbreaking-ios-6)  As far as I know, there's no 6.**1** (un)tethered jailbreak available (yet).
That we should like, or even care about sports. 
Leave it to reddit to downvote anything claiming Christian pastors are anything but literally Hitler.
The joke is she rides Tryndamere.   I think... 
It was in the movie hulk also
He should hit up Ray Lewis for some deer antler spray.
More context (if needed):  http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/17n0wk/dear_police_officers_pool_boys_delivery_men_etc/c874cpc?context=3
I once dreamed that I was walking alone at midnight and came to a tunnel that I needed to go through in order to get home. As I approached it, I noticed three men standing at the entrance to it and I instantly knew I'd be in trouble if they saw me. I tried calling my dad to pick me up, but my phone kept buzzing and flashing '1% Battery' and wouldn't go through, and as I was trying to remain silent and unseen, they started slowly walking towards me. Suddenly, I let out terrified screams of 'Please God! Save me!' And after shouting that a few times as they were getting closer, I suddenly darted awake and had a massive tingling sensation going from my head down to my feet. I've had loads of crazy dreams, but I think that this one had to have been the scariest!
Hey dude, let's argue what, in north america, is safe for work, k?  I'm sure we'll both have fun doing it.
I always love stuff like that. Kinda like the "heads I win, tails you lose" quote. I may try this too. Little hesitant, but I'm always game for new stuff.
In pink floyd's have a cigar, I always thought it said "We're so happy we could all make out." Turns out it is "We're so happy, we could hardly count." I still think my line is better.
dude looks quite clearly middle aged to me in a way i doubt a balding 20 year old would
You inspire me to greatness.
HOW THE FUCK DO YOU KNOW WHAT HE MEANS?
Man (or woman) intentionally carves upvote into hand seeking upvotes. /r/KarmaConspiracy 
 -----BEGIN PGP MESSAGE-----  Version: GnuPG v2.0.17 (MingW32)    hQEMA2k2c3T/GpdeAQf/b9lDGB4hFga3OJEJ83M+xrR/cXjNOROuAJzUqtfUk9rp  le9V5SWrauNkO0BhnOHF8CqBuqr8cqd1EtMKnp909LqWQd5Af/+hKfk3vGhQ2LLP  RfeF0Urw6GzGkIU8fxHZ6Mj6CapR55MEWMv1ijqPvLwac/XC8fizyxFSmN+2wqwF  81WIKmPWzrOG7DFU8xNnZpRQXY3iYsuF1T7qRJiHB0K1g/qX9o3Zyn7pSgJLnIpB  E5NRuYK/abaraRLSzsrDOrc4FPu4c9tXS+wAqk+Mm+2WlF4AcHQI+lHRGHmnHZz4  vtBKMq69hO/YZ0pjjJHTn5m02DnJjrBvoAls3h0x7NKDAbXKTYwrongQ8SQrThRY  VmRXYTDVr7tKXsqKkDbRjpIv8n9WZEgfub2ZmwwQYKWYHCVILfDbpNu+6cSd0QSI  zKZoneUmAmPtmYj9XkTBfkgLAUWK4fq7Rjwpijv3E0aYMZYEmwKDOhHlnxewg6GP  x1exw0+U8/m/EPcxdkFcnsv1P9A=  =jm6p  -----END PGP MESSAGE-----
Where else do you boil water? Unless you have one of those hot water dispenser things on the side of your sink. Wait are those things super common in the UK? It would make sense given the amount of tea that's drank
But by that logic, an MVP should only be eligible if they're with a new team. I'll admit, I have a huge bias for AD, but I don't think the "he was on the team last year, so the better play this year obviously isn't him" argument should hold water. 
Good little robot.
Funniest as in "What fucking editor cleared this shit" funny.
\#RobbedFromTheCradle
Keep a tally of how many times Sturridge smashes the ball into the sidenetting from a tight angle he should never shoot from.  He's got so much potential, but i see that as a barometer of how well he's playing.
/r/tipofmypenis 
Nipple and the rest of my breast. It's about 13cm long
I live on Vancouver island. Trends here are equal parts Australian-hippie and 90s creeker. %100 stoners.
In theory I like this idea and have been wanting to try it. I've done a grab bag before from another indie brand and was disappointed with it. I like the whole suprise element to it but like to have control over picking my colors lol. Too bad there aren't categories where you can't choose from like pinks, blues, glitters etc...
1. I got jobmail set up on the biggest job advertisement websites I know off, I get sent emails if a job shows up with the keywords I set up : Graduate, Mechanical , Engineer" 2. Target companies ? Target roles ?? At this stage I'd work inside the damn sewers if it's an engineering job. To answer your question though, I have been applying for any and all jobs I come across.  The problem with the whole networking thing and getting someone to chip in a good word for me, is that this isn't my home country, I really don't know that many people here at all. Though a couple of times I knew actual engineers in two companies and made mention of them in my application, still didn't get through.  Also thank you for the reply and help.
I have those days a lot. I almost  decided to do something nasty.   ***Almost Isaac, in a little you can let go and no one will blame you...***  [](/ppdevious) I am so ready to snap someone's arm and break someone's heart.
That's the thing about those old Italian flicks. The cinematography is gorgeous, the music atmospheric, and the acting horrendous. It's the most bizarre and fulfilling combination.
Pretty sure this is a page from a John Birch Society publication.
42 here. My last tv busted in 2001. I didn't get another one till 2 years ago. I don't have cable I just use it for dvds and my Wii.
go [here](http://pastebin.com/aM6LUyV9) for my public key
Happy to help :-) 
I'm happy to hear that the magnet masks are gone.
that was clearly a shotgun, if you had seen the video you are referencing and knew anything about what an AR-15 looks like, you would not have posted this comment.
Can you please elaborate on "welcome me home properly"?
Yet, being an attention whore comes cheap and easy.
As a bloke, I'd have to say Haytham Kenway from Assassin's Creed 3. One of the most suave and sexy characters I've ever had the pleasure of playing as. Kind of ended up wishing I could play as him instead of Connor the whole way through. [] (/hahaha)  Apart from that, I'd say Garrus from the Mass Effect series. That guy is like Space Braeburn.
NPC archers don't gain weapon levels; you want 50 Huscarls and 50 Rhodock Crossbowcutioners.
His sister is also an engineer :-)  
You are the best kind of person!
Wearing the Zora Tunic.
720noscopezplosions muthafuckaaa~
Middle child of five checking in.   There are no positives. 
Similar to [SNL Digital Short: The Tizzle Wizzle Show (Jammy Shuffle)](http://www.nbc.com/saturday-night-live/video/digital-short-the-tizzle-wizzle-show-jammy-shuffle/n12648/)
"People who talk in metaphors ought to shampoo my crotch." -Jack Nicholson
Yeah, I really concentrated on the Type 25 when the game first came out and it felt really good when I got my gold. 
And I've yet to get a single Orange from any raid boss except terramorphous. FML.
Totally but Im still a few stops from home and can't exactly fap here.
Thanks for the advice, but I already climbed it, and unfortunately the people whom I networked with don't have regular Internet access. 
Actually, it's pretty euphoric experience, suspension. The adrenaline etc can make you trip pretty well.
Thanks I love it!! 
Variations of: Edit: Upvotes? Really?
http://i.imgur.com/ZVy6tiX.png Here's the results. I usually get somewhere around 80-130 ping when I'm playing LoL or L4D2 or whatever. minecraft connection is mostly 3-4 bars on dedicated servers or most well run servers.
That's not what I meant. I'm talking about those that don't allow anyone else to talk at all. I also go into games with 4-6 people and we make it a point to save the full conversation for when we are put in the teams.
[yeah, bitch!](http://25.media.tumblr.com/tumblr_mb90k3gaDr1rch0iao1_500.gif)
They could be tapered maybe
Probably. Its already going to suffer a hit in playercount due to lack in advertising.  I stopped buying multiplayer games on console a long time ago.  They dont last without being named Modern Battlefield.  If you can get your regular L4D crew to buy it you may get some mileage.
Can't imagine this thing happens too often
Yeah, mill's mess is my specialty.  My 5 ball mills is about as solid as any other 5 ball move for me.  The only reason I ran it so briefly was because I was a couple seconds behind and I didn't get nearly the crowd reaction I expected :P
Was it the one made by /u/OmegaVesko? Think you'll find it somewhere on XDA if memory serves me correctly.
Best description ever.
I smoke with my dad. He talked to me about moderation and priorities.
Just don't wear a fedora 
I hate you.
the site totobay.com  thought it was a scam, but literally got beats headphones (Studio) for around $130 including shipping.
The real question is, do the Wildlings not know how to sail / row a boat?
The fact that he is getting attention is a fluke. Is this the way every community should behave? No. So it's not the way this person should behave. Work through the proper channels. If the proper channels don't function, fix them or replace them. What this guy is doing will make the situation worse.  ... unless somebody in city hall sees what is about to happen and pushes a few officers to the mall. But that's unlikely.
Just search in Windows Explorer for %appdata%. It's a hidden folder. You'll see .minecraft. Open that folder and you'll see Screenshots.
I think you have to wait until chapter 5. I forget where I read that today.
Good for the homeless cokehead that flagged down the cop. He probably saved that girl's life.  Nice to see that even crackhouse denizens have a moral compass.
Each girl also owned 2 of those tit birds. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Tit_(bird) 
OFFICIAL ACCUSATION THREAD TIME!
I don't have to worry now, 120mb cable! But I used to be on sub-dialup speeds and I couldn't play skyrim most of the time, it was infuriating. I think I actually played a pirated version for a while.
Wrestling. In the 90, I get it. With MMA and Cage fighting today, there's no reason in the world anyone has to watch that shit anymore. I understand maybe a few guilty pleasures, but it hurts my soul knowing how many people mindlessly follow this pure shit. 
&gt;~~Already made yourself look like an idiotic over and over again by insisting your~~ right ~~when the rest of the world knows you're~~ wrong   Same problem. Not understanding the idea of tolerated mistake. 
That hurt my head.
it was how it set the cookie TTL in PHP. Someone just added a really big number to it. 
I don't know why but I read the last half of your comment in Morgan Freeman's voice.  Wait, I do know why.. I watched Shawshank Redemption 2 hours ago.
i highly recommend turning off the all-chat and ignore chat at all before you hit lvl 30. I did it, helped me a lot.
Except the Deagle does a shit ton more damage than the other pistols - nearly 2 to 3 times more than say, the USP. Not to mention headshots are 1-shots. It's nothing like that in Planetside, the Magshot damage is only slightly less, 20% or so.
Suggestions=whining? You sound sound open minded.
It literally makes everything easier to do, and it's not like doing core exercise is going to make them fat.
Good luck on your quest!
Not a woman, but my wife has NEVER asked that. I usually say she looks amazing before she has a chance to ask that question. Doesn't hurt that she is smoking hot.
&gt; learning *then* buying a couple  Seriously. Don't buy before you at least try. Find a range in your area that offers rentals and go try a few. Stick with 9mm if you intend on buying one for each of you...share ammo and recoil is manageable.   Look at Glock  Smith &amp; Wesson M&amp;P, Springfield XD, and maybe some Rugers.   Also, "inexpensive" is relative, but you don't want to spend much less than $400 if you ever intend to carry or use these for home defense. You want reliable...that is not usually cheap.
So what did they look like AFTER you mowed them OP?
Ok, so I'll just remake the question by Spring/Summer?
It's not just the money.  Drugs fascinate me.  How can a little tiny pill have such a massive affect on the body?  (I understand but it's still awesome)  When I'm not dealing with assholes I love my job.  It's just that I would be more ok with the assholes if I was making pharmacist pay. 
I used to work in a New Delhi IT center, but then I took an arrow too the knee!
Up.
&gt;Isn't cooler master a reliable brand?  Cooler Master's Silent Pro PSUs are alright. Everything else? Stay away.  That unit in particular is [a complete joke](http://www.hardwaresecrets.com/article/Cooler-Master-Elite-Power-460-W-Power-Supply-Review/1005/1), and should be avoided at all costs.
the Sauce! http://www.xvideos.com/video3606052/porn4down.com_-_passion_hd_-_leony
Still can't tell. If you want advice about fit take a picture like [this.](http://i.imgur.com/PCYHj.jpg) Also in the future there's a fit check feedback thread [here.](http://www.reddit.com/r/malefashionadvice/search?q=+title:%22outfit+feedback%22+author:MFAModerator&amp;restrict_sr=on&amp;sort=new&amp;t=all)
"Today you, tomorrow me"
Except you know they're classified as a hate group
And a bacon bar
I'd punch my monitor if I let the gif finish loading... my monitor is a CRT with 3" thick glass, would not end well.
Commanders are the way to go but for some reason when I sit in mine I cant help but be reminded of sitting in  my old 1989 ford bronco 2 lol.
Pretty sure more sub 30 accounts are smurfs than actual "newbies."  I know I've played my smurf and everyone on my team is also smurfing.  It becomes a huge burden to have 1 or more true low levels on your team.  I know new people playing the game is good and all, but I'm just trying to bust out first win of the day not teach some noob how to play and build a certain champ...  Also yea, low levels, people talk a stupid amount of shit.  Although, it feels like there is more low level shit talk, it isn't nearly as sincere as ranked game shit talk.  Leveling in any game with endgame is usually the crappy grindy part, so it's probably good for noobies to get used to the assholes early, because once you're 30, it's not nearly as bad.
all i got was a brigadier helm and glengarry bonnet. i sure hope that if they change what you get, that it gives it along with the 2 hats. I was honestly expecting another gift box
The t-shirt comes from T-Shirt Hell, an aptly named online store with many such 'tasteful' items..  [T-Shirt Hell](http://www.tshirthell.com/funny-shirts/slavery-gets-shit-done/)
It is mostly just a thing Christians say. It's not a "here I'm shoving God in your face." It's like saying "have a nice day."
I understood that reference
I'm sorry for your loss. I lost my mom in October of 2011. There are two things that get to me about it. I don't like hearing people bad mouth their mother and say that it is impossible for them to get along and that they can't stand being around them. I also get a knot in my stomach when people ask me what my parents do for a living.
Teens don't understand this concept. Good on you. 
I would definitely watch that in all its B-movie glory.
And, I explained it. We all win!
This is apparently the work of /u/jaafit .  See also: /r/minethings  Haven't tried it myself, but I was surprised to see it hadn't been posted here yet.
Everything I have ever known up until this point has been a lie...
If I was back inn school I'd remember to take advantage of the social aspects since it seems to never be easier. (You probably know this I'm just reminding you from the outside.)
Have you tried Uniqlo? Cheap and my guess is slimmer than Banana Republic.
Politicians are already anticipating this. They want to put a GPS tracking device on your car that tracks every mile you drive. So every_mile_you_drive * tax_rate = tax_bill. Convenient. 
So unions would be banned from any political activity?  And I'm not really sure how this applies to someone like Rush Limbaugh. Presumably he counts as an activist business. Does that mean he can't take money from non-activist advertisers?  I think this still misses the heart of the issue of Citizens United, which is what is the difference between my money and the money of a business that I own?
Me too!!
Obviously he/she is a fairy tale dinosaur! That's pretty dang impressive, if you ask me. 
It's the same reason Lucic is a scumbag.
Reality TV now 99% less real, keep watching.
You have a few options:   1. Get over it 2. Get back together (if this is not a possibility for him, refer to #1) 3. Murder them both. 
Well they made Catwoman kinda overly attractive there didn't they!  I can relate to that decision.  [](/raritywarm)
People are greedy and they think lawyers make a ton of money. They argue that taking out a huge loan for law school is worth it because they'll make enough to pay it off in a few years. You also can get into law school with any undergraduate degree. So you have a bunch of people with useless degrees not knowing what to do next, and picking law school.
This. It's important to understand that SAP does not drive business, business drives *it*. Understanding business processes will really help you gain a deep understanding of what SAP is trying accomplish.  It's a lot easier to learn SAP when you're not trying to learn what the business is trying to do at the same time.
Can I get a link to that UFO please
Hit the bricks nigga
That's Called capitalism.
Bring a computer/book, enjoy time off?
Did I take a joke too seriously? I'm fairly sure I took a joke seriously.
You will be executed for such heretic thoughts, traitor. Plasma cannons have been in the emperors´ arsenal for thousands of years.  Srsly, if you don´t know Warhammer you miss something in your life.
Per our rules, picture links are not allowed.  Your post has been automatically removed by SysadminAutoMod.  If you'd like to appeal this removal, please message the moderators with the grounds for your appeal.  &gt; Posts of pictures are not permitted. If your post requires a picture put it in the text.  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%23sysadmin) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Awesome
Kind of a slow cooker noob here, so a couple questions:  1. You don't chop the onions - just slice them? Do you leave them ringed or in pieces?   2. How much is a bit of additional soda for the moisture? And do you pour it to the side so as not to wash off the dry rub you've sprinkled on top? 
There are kitty chew toys you can get too. I have a Kong for cats and my cat loves it. Particularly when there's a nice yummy treat in there for her. :3
For the benefits thing, I do think they provide mostly free care for some people. Even if you can't stay with family, maybe finding roommates is still an option?
The back haul is just the physical link to get edge nodes to a larger network (usually the internet). It is layer 1 and 2 of the [OSI model](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/OSI_model) (if I am not mistaken). It doesn't care what information is transmitted along it. If you're trying to separate out a CJDNS tunnel from regular network traffic it's another deal.  To regular programs CJDNS appears as a layer 2 item (a tun ethernet device), but what it does when traffic is passed to it is to send it out over the back haul (utilizing layer 4). I'm probably not being very clear (I'm still not exactly certain what you're asking). Maybe look up diagrams that explain how a VPN works over the internet. CJDNS follows the same tunneling concept.
It's an admin power. Mods can see your posts, and choose to leave them in the spam filter or approve them, but that's the limit of what we can do. You're definitely not on the subreddit-specific ban list, if that helps. 
I remember that set from Shaun of the dead 
NOBODY GIVES A FUCK
How is it poor ownership ?
DO IT
I don't trust a man who can't have a drink
Either Snooluru, or Reddalong. Both are fantastic. 
That would be great! Her name is Frankie. It's an odd name but my friend named her haha. If you like you can always meet her first :)
Sure did!  I love the little references.  I wonder if they will tie in any more from 101 Dalmations.  Cruella de Vil, perhaps?
Love the first seasons of the show, but last 2 seasons not so much. Amy Poehler's Parks and Recreations have saved me from the disappointment!
Man I want that shirt!
It seems like a 20/80 split between girls/guys at most shows. Amazingly, the line for the women's restroom is always longer.
They killed Newman. Bastards. 
Every 12 months or so *someone* claims to have found evidence of a Tasmanian Tiger - either some pawprints (which turn out to be feral dogs or feral cats) or some fuzzy, out of focus photograph or video.  Tasmania is relatively small and, while there are significant areas of wilderness areas, pretty much everywhere has been explored.
I'm sure a lot do. I'm sure many also go right back home and get cushy jobs with great benefits and vacation time while helping their countries advance.
Louis Armstrong: feline version
So people could hack me or something if i have java not disabled in my browser? Sry, dont know anything of this stuff.
I want the music.
$45 seems like a bit much.  If/when I do set up shop, I'll put these around $20
You're not a good tackler if you can't get yourself in a good position to tackle someone.
Loose your dignity while you at it. 
The stupidity of him obliging your request might trump your own stupidity in this situation 
If 8 year olds get assault rifles in North Korea, I'll suggest to my gun toting 'murica co-workers they move there.  
My first was a 32MB. I used it for saving papers in school instead of 3.25 floppy. 
Actually a Radford kid, but hokiefan240 has always been my screen name 
'because we were post holing in three feet of deep snow'  haaaahahaah he must have heard that one from someone.
Whether he hacks or not is besides the point - you either enjoy his videos or you don't. Watch them, or don't watch them - it doesn't really bother me, or Frankie himself I suspect. Nobody forces you to watch them. :P He delivers entertaining content to those that want it, and whether he needs a little help to obtain that content from time to time doesn't change what he delivers to his viewers - i.e. if he couldn't get any interesting footage in DayZ he'd stop playing/uploading and would instead deliver entertaining Battlefield content, for example. :)
In 8th grade at basketball practice before school.  I pantsed (yanked the pants down) of a team mate in the school foyer as we were going to get water from the fountain.  Pants held on to underwear.  There he is with penis hanging out.  Didn't see coach of cross country team coming in the door.  She gets an eye full of a 14 year old's cock and decides to turn me in to principal, bitch.  He gave me ISS but laughed when I got there.  He says he has to but it was the funniest damn thing he's heard in a while.  Spent the day just hanging out in the principal's office, not too bad.
pretty much *all* of the things in my life that are good are bought with money
For me it's a tie between Tyler Myers and Andrej Sekera.
Watched the video 4 times just for the song.
In 2010 my girlfriends dad had a stroke.   Its a hard process But it dose get better.   http://www.flickr.com/photos/cwitte/sets/72157625465929669/
I'm Danish. There's a gang war going on, people shoot and stab each other to death. Most weapons comes from the war in the old Yugoslavia and from inside jobs in the Danish military. We had a case where a goldsmith got tired of being robbed all the time, so he got an illegal gun and chases the robbers out of his store. He got a short prison sentence and a facebook fan group.  Smugglers get more and more efficient, so it's easier and easier to get guns here in Europe (hard drugs prices are falling for the same reason). I could get guns within 24 hours just from knowing people who sells hard drugs.
Yup.  And at least in the US and Canada it's long been normal (in the sense that nobody at the theaters care) to see 3 movies for the price of one during the day.
You can down vote me into oblivion but if you're working or looking to work in (at least) finance, law, politics, accounting, or going to be in a position that requires gaining favor of someone in one of those fields I would STRONGLY suggest erring on the side of traditional conservative business attire - particularly in the South or North East.  
She is the lead singer of my band (symphonic metal) and I feel like there is a bit of a personal issue going on. I'll talk to her about it tomorrow.
It would be worth it
I **slowly** looked down.  Because I knew I knew better, but... did I really know better?  Just maybe... Nope.  Just as I suspected.  F12 and Print Scrn.
Keep them entertained until they put their head through the wall
[Totally badass](http://imgur.com/moJZuUf)  Edit: changed to imgur link.
Welcome to Atlanta! Now get out the motha fuckin doorway.
I dont understand how radioshak stays in business. They have horrible customer service and shitty products that are over priced. Why are they still around?
I know that many subredits have a seperate sub for questions. IT support, networking, programming reddits off the top of my head. What if there was an /askspikes subreddit?
100
&gt;The government isn't supposed to humiliate citizens. The whole point of the eighth amendment is that even criminals should be allowed to have human dignity.  Having human dignity doesn't mean that society can't shame you for breaking the law.  There's plenty of evidence that humiliation is a pretty effective deterrent.  And as noted above, the dude freely *chose* this option.  Obviously he preferred any "humiliation" involved above being incarcerated.
You're just describing a contract. If I voluntarily enter into a contract, I cannot simply change my mind and not either perform the contract or pay damages. That's not compulsion, because it is contractually agreed-to. You can define compulsion that way if you like, but it's not a common definition, it's not defined that way in legal theory, and Rothbard didn't use that definition.
Both.
And why does this not work both ways?   Your statement is the racist one here. You've just implied being black is worthy of insult. You have also implied white people are somehow better and its impossible to insult their race. 
"Bully" mommas knockers is what piqued my interest. 
You are pitiful.
It's not really about the blood.
It isn't our choice. We have to shoot neutrals to come through our territory, because they're competing with us for our (extremely limited) anomalies and plexes, they could be a hostile scout/cyno alt. We lose security status when we engage these players, we end up at -10 eventually.  It's not because we're pirates, it's because we're defending our EVE homes.
Neither did I. I didn't come into my sexuality until a couple years ago and only had one encounter with a person of both genders simultaneously. All others were one on one.. but I'm still usually dating a guy exclusively.
You've never heard of swamp ass?!  Seriously, you must live in the desert.
Yes, this subreddit is specifically for Instant Watch, you should not post a film if it is not available to view online.
[1967 Shelby Mustang GT500](http://www.mustangeleanor.net/data/media/5/1967_Shelby_Mustang_Gt_500_Eleanor_02.jpg)
Please tell me I was not the only nuts who saw the one first. 
&gt;a stadium who would need more renovations in the future  The new dome that Blank will build will also need renovations as well over time. The Mercedes-Benz Superdome is over 40 years old. Still home to many Super Bowls, and very profitable for the city of New Orleans because its paid for.   &gt;The fact is, Blank wants and is getting a new stadium.  I'd love to have a billion dollars so I could buy a government like this guy. Its quite lovely how the construction supplies, which would generate a lot of money in taxes, are tax exempt and most of the jobs created will be from out of state or country. Its also rather lovely how Blank is not paying property taxes for this either. Its lovely how Blank gets control over what big events come to the city. Its lovely that Blank keeps all revenue generated from parking, product sales, and events in the dome.  Did you miss the part about Georgia having to pay several hundred million dollars to upgrade the area around the site of the new dome, in addition to the hundreds of millions they're putting out just to get Blank to agree to build it?
Why do people act like this? (Not the security guard, he is just doing his job) ...It's disgusting
I like wearing track suits. It is pure freedom for the male genitalia. I am serious.  The chavs probably think, "I am poor. Why should my balls suffer, I am not getting paid to wear jeans."
SHIVA H VISHNU!
Friends with an overly-large vampire who likes dancing?  He'd have to be a sucker.
Keep the Acura, It's a much nicer car than the VW. The MKV golfs aren't the best ones they had. I had a 2007 VW Rabbit and loved it, but I prefer my TL, it's just so smooth and classy. A few modifications and it can feel quite modern.
I just wonder what it would be like to have balls. Would I get a heat rash, would I wear boxers or briefs, would I shave my balls....   Otherwise I don't think life would be any easier as a man. We all have societal/religious/family expectations or pressures that either make us, break us, or we move on from. 
There are more uses then just stairs for this.
Hey maybe I'm just weird, but I can't think of anyone who would be better off smokin weed with their parents than being self sufficient and financially secure
To be fair, he probably found out his wife was manufacturing the highest quality meth in New Mexico while undergoing treatment and he just couldn't handle the stress.
If all particles stopped moving entirely, while your body remained the same speed as you're used to, you would freeze to death in seconds.  Kinetic energy averages are what makes temperature. If there's no molecular motion, there's no heat. Everything apart from you would be 0 Kelvin. So not only would photons not hit your eye unless you moved them to the back of your eye manually by running, you'd also probably disintegrate.
I heard that Suggs once killed a guy by dicking him in the face 1,000 times. Then he cut the other guy's dick off and put it on a chain around his neck. I hear that, to this day, he still wears that lucky dick around his neck, and when he's in need of luck he pulls out his lucky dick and kisses it.
No, it was Abraham Lincoln during the 1812 War.
Well, at least if you get it from the library, it was paid for at one point.
That might have a crumb of profundity if it were based in anything but mindless mysticism (i.e. total bullshit).
This visual phenomenon... About the growing ball of light... I thought I was one of the only ones...  Check this out. I get that too it's like a green orange crystaline ball of spiky energy... Sleep dep day 2 is usually required for this experiment to take place 1. Sit in Black or dimly lit room 2. Find a spot on your wall about 5m of farther from you 3 pick something against the wall, like a black dot, or nail  4. Thousand yard stare that motherfucker for a good 20 seconds or so just keep your eyes trained on it and never look away.' 5. Now focus your eyes on that dot, glare at that bitch 6. Focus all your mental energy on the thought "green spiky ball of energy I summon thee" COMMAND IT! just keep focusing on conjuring it up again 7. Keeping focused on the target keep blasting it with thoughts of "grow grow grow!!!" and in probally 5-10 seconds this thing will start "blooming"   I tell you whhat... I have gotten to the point where if I haven't slepd in 4 days. I can do those steps in bout 4 Seconds all together.. I've gotten that green ball to envious the facade of the whole tripler hospital .  It's like a toy. Totally legit. I've shown a few people this and they will spend the whole night finding ways to play with it and command it. 
John Morrison, Carlito, Shelton Benjamin, and Chris Masters come back and fuck shit up together.
I bought this fridge for my house. It has one of those pullout shelves. Never thought I'd use it, too gimmicky. Its practically the only thing I use.  http://www.sears.com/shc/s/p_10153_12605_04688733000P
Somewhat true. Can't miss what you never had and all that. 
/r/atheism is a garbage sub for pseudo-intellectual teens to jerk themselves off and shower in "bravery". You think that we non subscribers are basing our negative views on a few stupid posts, and if we really read the sub, we'd change our minds? Well that's a load of shit. The only atheism posts that we ever see are your top voted posts. And if that is the best of what you have to offer, I don't even want to think about the lower rated posts. 
Live life get paid get laid...   Then Wake up after that last part
i dont buy it
00 sir In the middle of polishing them up again. This time ill clear coat when i am done lol.
That's not all he sprayed over the monitor... ಠ_ಠ
looking good! moar!
I could do that. I love metal \m/
I should have been a bit more prepared. I couldn't really find anything decent online but I do own [this](http://www.newsouthbooks.com.au/isbn/0868407569.htm) book which is a good start.  I'll try to find some more but most of my knowledge on this came from school.
The world is my target.
Had long reply about how mobility is the soul of the magrider.  Then read this tweet!  https://twitter.com/mhigby/status/297119336211021824  I'm just gonna say it.  SOE are f***ing awesome.  &gt;We're going to hold back the changes to the Magrider's hover until we see how the other tank changes work out. Thx for feedback. #PS2ning
How did you manage to eat two or three? God it tastes awful.
Either you are a good researcher or (like me) you need more hobbies.
Okay, but I have a beard. 
I suppose the other idea I had was to just cut two or three on my dominant hand... Idk if that would be worse though
I say that taking a label as Gospel is a mistake, especially in politics.  No party, whatever they would name themselves, is pure to the ideology. In some aspects they are outright wolves in sheep clothing (e.g. BC Liberals).
I'm in a very similar situation. I don't have an issue with the thought of rejection, it's the *actual* rejection that hurts the most. It's not a new phenomena either. It's like everything I deeply care about suddenly gets wretched out of my life. Like, one week things will great with love and plans for the future then the next.. well, you're head is spinning and trying to figure out what happened. And you ask yourself, "How can I do better next time? What can I change to make sure this never happens again?"   And for a while, you think you've got it. But sure enough.. it happens again. And again. And again. Each time, you try to learn from your mistakes, and you try to do better, be better. But when will it ever be good enough? When will you actually have those people that you see others constantly surrounded by? When will you have friends and a lover that care about you as much as you care about them?  It's terribly isolating. It's like, you just don't fit in anywhere. You're a tourist. Never actually home. Always abroad. Wether you're in a hotel room or your actual home you just feel disconnected from everything. You try to be "buy in" to this whole life thing people keep going on about.. and you keep getting burned by it. You keep getting rejected by everyone. No one's really there for you in life. That cold, hard realization begins to settle in and you suddenly start to wonder what it'd be like to just step off the train platform as the muni comes in for a stop.   You're not even curious about what people will think at your funeral. There's no delusion. They'll mourn, sure. But within a few days everything will be back to normal for them. You feel like you're a specter that's already happened.  I don't know how to say it will get better because I don't know myself. But I have past experience to go on.. and I'm stubborn like that I guess. I just know it will get better. If my lot in life is to be a traveling specter, then I guess it is. But with each iteration inbetween rejection I know that I have more going for me. More happening personally.   Does this lead to happiness? I don't think it ultimately does. Honestly part of me despises it. But it's something I guess. In the meantime I try to keep in mind that I'm ultimately blind to those around me. I know logically, or at least suspect, that I matter a lot more then I realize even if I don't feel like it emotionally.   All I can say is, don't kill yourself, and earnestly hope you don't. If you want a drinking buddy or even just a friend to talk it over with, I'll PM you my details. It's not charity since I could use someone to talk to myself. Hope this helps and god bless. 
So good it became a verb for "destroy someone on a diss track"
The Windsor Salt mine is still in production to this day
When I was sixteen, I did a golfing course, and when teaching us how to putt, the instructor put down a marker thing we were supposed to line up our feet and club on... and when I had my feet in place, I couldn't see it so I couldn't line up the putter, and I couldn't really explain why I was having difficulty to him.
i don't think very many crossfits at all have a "cult aura" at all the gym is more likely to have snotty people in them 
MC is minecraft.
Balls seem to be working all right.
I really like the one in Pink Floyd's Money.  Also the classic one in Baker Street. 
I like to think that i live on the wilder side of life
Been through the trenches during the early part of this month but oh so worth it. One month free and ten pounds lighter. The only light on me is shining through me. 
That 3/5 compromise reduced the power of the slave faction in the newly formed government.   Does your foot hurt yet, or do you need to chew on it some more?
Wall of text
get yourself some corrupted lodestones and craft a jormag's breath! Probably nicest sword in the game (nicer than Bolt IMO) 
It would be impossible for us redditors to buy and send him Level III armor plates due to restrictions unless it's mailing out to a registered agency. So what reddit could do is to just gather donation money and just send him a big fat check.  
they eat meat? i already feed my 2 birchirs beef heart; chicken livers; and assorted vegetables. Would this be okay for a knife fish? 
We need more guys like this.
&gt; Aint nobody got time for that.  It's reddiquette to post the animated gif, even if I visualized her saying it without you posting it.
CK
Video Street View seems a bit overkill TBH. 
Some people do this. I can't ever seem to pull it off personally, but some people can just flip the switch and be back into friend mode.
Responsible pet ownership pisses you off?  You area a really confused guy.
I can currently buy a tank and a jet fighter...
Too fucking right. I don't know why Apple are so precious about implementing such blatant usability features likes this.
So, for example, if I want to get [Supernova](http://sinisa91g.deviantart.com/art/Supernova-Icons-339667999), how would i go about it?
Hi, thanks for the message!  I thought about that but I wasn't sure how much interest would be retained.  You know how fast things move on the Internet and with a one week deadline (or longer) a lot of people might lose interest and move on. In addition, while I think it would be great to see some of the exceptional work that could arise in that timeframe, there are just more cons than pros.  First, I don't want this contest to consume hours upon hours of anyone's life.  It would make me feel sad to know someone spent umpteen hours on a project not to even place.  Second, those that would put such a long effort into this would pretty much blow out the average joe from having a shot at the prize. My goal is that this allows everyone to have a chance to participate.  Things like a screenshot with sentimental value, an action scene, or a simple sketch are all just fine.  No matter how busy someone's life is, I don't think it should be too hard for anyone to have a chance to contribute and enjoy the contest this way.  **Edit:** I will remain open to the idea of extending the deadline.  If a lot of people feel this is the better option, please reply here with your reasoning. **Edit 2:** Okay, the new deadline is February 4 - 12:00 AM PST, 3:00 AM EST, 8:00 AM GMT!  This will be the final date, good luck everyone that enters the contest!
Don't worry.  You didn't exist until you were born and that didn't hurt a bit.  Sure, life is a lot of fun and not being able to do it any more is going to suck but hey, if you stop existing then it's not like you're going to mind very much.  
Please not a PS4 Announcement, last thing I want to hear.
Classic. Also, great top comment on that video haha. 
I think what Walorus is getting at is when you open your first WC you really want good loot. So you try to hard to simply put in to much damage and you get yourself killed. All I recommend is that you watch several videos on how it works and how to avoid shotguns! Remember you barely need any damage to get loot and keep in mind that it's best to live and fight another day! Good luck as you move into your next stage of Realm fun!
[dude... ] (http://farm5.staticflickr.com/4119/4876696414_d3f62d18be_z.jpg)
Okaay
I like how you pretend to be anti-Israel when it's clear you just hate Jews.
pahahahaha!
BUT NOT WHEN WE TICKLE YOU
&gt; he's marketing it as the only one on outpost. I don't want to sabotage his business  Dat class.  :P
[](/ppshrug)To be fair, that's often what conversations in pony subs amount to as well.   [](/sp) [](/sp) [](/ppcute)^(just kidding I love you guys)
Know nothing about Japanese, but it seems like they say "mugiwara no kaizoku-da" or something along those lines, the 'no' being a possessive word or something like that, like mugiwara no luffy or hiken no ace
Magic
A lot of people complain about Dexter declining over the years, but I think it tends to vary from season to season and doesn't have much to do with how long it's on air. I'm still always entertained by it and excited to catch up regardless of any negative thoughts i've had about certain seasons. Dexter's worst is still better than a lot of television's best.
Chi Katso!
Chest, without allres it shouldn't be that much gold we're talking about
Whats your favourite thing to cook? and don't say penguins.
pm'ed you
Ain't no party like a Liz Lemon party cuz the Liz Lemon party is over :(
All this from olive leaf extract? Sounds too good to be true! I will have to try it out!! (:
Think of it as if you were playing Necrolyte.  Sure, the item supports the team, but buying one does not pigeon-hole you into a support role.
All statistics that I know http://store.steampowered.com/stats/  http://www.dota2.com/overview/external/?appid=570&amp;l=english  http://www.google.com/search?q=dota+2 http://www.google.com/search?q=league+of+legends
On his epitaph it'll read "Nigga did what he gotta did"
"That weapon isn't a toy. When you pull the trigger, you have to mean it. "
Haha that's what I named my first bong
I reaaaaly don't see why people like the anger, looks horrible imo, but nevertheless, for those who do, this is a great price.
The periods are throwing me off. xD I'm just a silly 'Murican
It would be too crowded!
Warrents? We don't need no stinking warrents! We are the police/government. Send em all to jail and let the courts sort it out later. Too poor to get good legal representation? Well then you are going to sit in jail for awhile.
From the episode "Manners Suck".  Mike Judge Collection volume one.
I think my favorite achievement in terms of wording was earned while playing Portal 2: "The Part Where He Kills You" and the description is simply "This is that part." .. cracked me up.
Daddy or chips? Daddy or chips? ...... chips!
Just go ahead and say it, why don't you.  SUPPOSED.
Edit: going to beantown comedy
It's kinda bullshit that people put that much work into something that isn't even that powerful.  The skin is awesome but it's not worth 3 months of constant playing.
Get a little OOMPH behind that statement soldier! THIS IS 'MURICA!!
[Here is the Imgur link](http://imgur.com/ZZWj6lh)
So I should leave a several hundred dollar higher tip just because you brought me the Dom rather than a normal white wine?  Tipping makes so much sense.
Just wait till it's over 9000.
3 teleports + 3 revives + 5 exhausts = 11 spells
Ah, the good old reddit curry vindaloo.
the addition of "halftime" was a huge improvement!
&gt;ATTACHMENT IS THE CAUSE OF ALL SUFFERING  Damn bro blew my mind. thats some true shit, but never spoken.
Someone definitely did...I'll help you offset. :)  Generally, people will get downvoted commenting on their own OPs because people seem to think you are farming comment karma. Personally, I feel that you made a self post to discuss something with us; you shouldn't be punished for that.
As long as it's not with Vancouver. 
good question. in "the angels take Manhattan" that guy who collects angels had one chained up and he had beat it to the point of leaving heavy "wounds" on the angel to see if it could feel pain and it could. so why not just take some C4 and blow the fuck out of them?
Damn that's a hot cock!!
Like what?
I would give you reddit gold if I had it. But until then take this measley upvote.
How am I taking this out of context? I am not the one comparing him to a grunt in Nazi Germany. I am responding directly to points made by others.   If you signup for the military, you can't bitch and moan when you are ordered into combat. You can refuse to fight, but then you need to face the consequences you agreed to when  you signed up. The only thing you are allowed to do is refuse to commit war crimes. And no, a grunt undertaking standard combat in Iraq is not committing war crimes. And nor was a front-line German in standard combat during WWII. 
Oh, never mind, I thought you were trying to say it's a psychological trick to crush someone so hard that his team will start flaming him.   Using all chat to incite rage between enemy players is a dick move of course, I fully agree.
This sounded like a 7 minute broken record. 
"Happiness is a choice. You can never control what happens to you, but you can always control how you react - Choose to be happy." - My father.
Actually, you can get skins for Facebook. I have a Black one.  I downloaded it via the Chrome app Stylish, but I'm sure there's other ways.  And yes, there IS a pink one.
They are until they earn their respect. Menard has done well enough to stay. Many drivers that race on daddy's money come and go.
Macbride Raptor Project (MRP) in eastern Iowa.  I've been volunteering there for over five years, and I love it!
This is true. Plus Jon seems to *really* want to continue. Arin's seems to be treating it like their normal "Play till one wins the majority and then move on" but Jon wants to stretch it out. Hopefully they decide to do the story mode and then when they unlock a bunch of characters and get used to the game more they can come back and do another versus. Jon and Arin, if you guys read the comments in this sub anymore please do this.
Make it stop
Knock them the fuck out, true story.
- 1080p on a 11" display is no longer impressive.  - The i5 in Surface Pro doesn't live up to its namesake, it's closer to their Celeron or Atom chips in performance than desktop or even laptop Ivy Bridge chips.  - The Wacom digitizer **is** a nice idea.  - The internal SSD starts off 30 GB smaller than advertised due to OS bloat; a 32 GB smartphone has about the same usable capacity as a 64 GB Surface Pro.  Also, the fact alone that it's an SSD doesn't say much about its performance.  - Magnesium alloy **is** a great material.  - Windows 8 is not a selling point right now; this is doubly the case when you consider that Microsoft doesn't pay a license fee to use it.  When you have a product that has no brand power and a very immature (touch-based) software ecosystem, you don't get to charge the same as another product that has both - unless your product is overwhelmingly superior.  Surface Pro is not: it is measurably inferior to existing laptops which cost less money and have better features, and it is measurably inferior to existing tablets which have a mature library of touch-based applications.  Apple can get away with charging a premium because they have a great reputation and a long history of high-quality and innovative products.  They also have the best library of touch-based software.  Also, a cult.  Google understands this.  Their "Nexus" devices lack enthusiast features but they are priced so cheaply that they establish a baseline for each generation.  With the Nexus and Chromebook devices you can buy directly from them, they've effectively destroyed the market for shitty low-end devices that ruin their reputation as a whole.  Microsoft should be doing the same thing: produce a baseline but high-quality product and leave the high-end and enthusiast markets to their partners.  Showcase their OS and make it desirable, not try to produce something that screws over their partners. In theory, x86 Windows on a tablet is great because it means there's a huge back-catalog of great software, but in reality so little of the software is optimized for touch that it's not much of a feature.  **In time** this will improve, but **today** is when they're selling it at a premium price point against rivals that have better touch-based functionality for half the price or less.
Damn it. Now I want some ice cream.
Find out where the kid got the gun and put them under the jail.
Sporting without Roger and Kei is just... wow.  Their squad has enough talent to not go into full blown Toronto mode but it will definitely hurt them.   Edit: That's terribly rude of me to throw Toronto under the bus like that.  I do love you guys up there and you're usually one of the first teams to get made fun of.  I apologize.  I want to see you guys in the playoffs this year.
Thanks, here's hoping we all get through the week without too many incidents. I've been a little out of it lately, while I haven't had too many incidents stomach/gut wise while I'm working on this new dietary plan, I've been having a lot more ache in my joints and fatigue this week.
No.  Eunuchs were used because they were believed to be devoid of all desires for women.  Therefore, they could be trusted to guard the harem.  This allowed the eunuchs to get close to those in power, and of course in the court you could easily be raised up if you caught the eye of someone important.  Eunuchs were also believed to be more incorruptible in other matters, such as loyalty and so forth.
The good news is that as long as it's fake I'm *pretty* sure the whole "future serial killer" thing doesn't apply. I mean, I'm not one. Yet.
http://i0.kym-cdn.com/photos/images/newsfeed/000/173/580/Wat.jpg?1315930588
you have that background without the text?
Quick note I need to dance.
[Samsara.](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Samsara_%282011_film%29)
Out of curiosity, where does this image come from?  It's been pointed to a dozen different times as a concern, but I don't remember seeing it anywhere.  The oldest Orc picture I could find was the one that everyone posts as a counter to this one (a day after announcement) http://www.gamespot.com/the-elder-scrolls-online/channel/image/1696380/
I'll be looking forward to your future exploits.
report his ass.
Oh my gosh I know you are offline but can I please have one when of both when you get back on?
I really need to get through that book! I've tried on several occasions, but I never make it past this section. I think I have 3 or 4 separate tries of this same sketch in my sketch book and 1 of the horse. Ha ha!   I'm gonna try to pry myself off of Reddit after this and pick up that book again.
colour?
24-21 49ers 589 yards
Best best part about that play: They called a defensive pass interference on the guy that was covering him. 
The word spiritual is in the dictionary, it means - incorporeal or non-physical.  Hinduism describes its 3 main qualities as will, consciousness and sentience. (sat, chit, ananda). These qualities are accepted as non-physical.  This is from Bhagavad Gita (Chapter 8) -  &gt; "Lord Krishna said - Spirit is the imperishable, eternal and absolute. The soul is the living being’s eternal spiritual nature. Karma, or fruitive action, is action in connection with these material bodies, which repeatedly binds the soul to this material world of suffering.  &gt;"The material world consists of the perishable and the endlessly changeable. I am the lord of sacrifice present as the supersoul in the heart of every living being, witnessing, sanctioning and rewarding all actions."   
[](/flutterroll) Come on dude, you know when you stick wings on a purple pastel pony it has to ruin the show and make you question your faith in humanity. Didn't you read the manual?
Unsure. I'm not a professional tester. Moon has a pic posted of the ambient temp in one of his tests. Here it is.   Http://www.imgur.com/q4vMp.jpg
My step dad plays that
I have an account. But I only keep just enough in there to pay bills. Everything else I pay cash. I just don't feel comfortable having all my money in a bank. Wells Fargo jacked me out of $300 once and it would have been $700 had I not been lucky enough to have a deposit receipt on me at the time. 
can you have an option to turn off the music?
I waffled like this for a long time until I realized I could rent a car a couple times a year for far less than I was paying in insurance/parking/maintenance.
The original Duke Nukem? Available for free download about halfway down [this page](http://dosgames.com/g_side2.php). There's two episodes that come after it too, but they're not shareware.
what site
The Jazz have a pretty favorable stretch in their schedule right now with a lot of home games coming up. That should certainly help out their case, especially if (when) Millsap or Jefferson gets traded. I have to go with the Rockets for #2 but it should be close! 
onsighting at a certain level implies a degree of control over the body and thus the ability to move safely and effectively on a campus board instead of just thrutching and hoping for the best.  And take into account that the OPs original gripe was hat he is lacking power.  Straight up laddering on a campus board will net you roughly zero gains in terms of power.  Contact strength yes. Power no.  Training "power" means skipping rungs, making longer moves, and being able to latch a rung with 2, 3, 4 rungs inbetween your starting rung and target.  Or double clutching (I probably shouldnt even mention that here...).  A V3 climber will not have developed the fast twitch muscle to safely (or at all) be able to do this, but will get hurt in the process of attempting it.  To say nothing of the fact that even the least gifted of climbers should be able to climb V3 in fairly short order.  I never related onsight ability to connective tissue integrity, however for the novice climber that has yet to develop the tendon strength for as intensive an activity as campus boarding is, what do you think the weakest link in the chain is?  I'll give you a hint:  connective tissue integrity.  And what would better serve the climber in question, attempting to campus, sustaining an injury and being out for weeks to months (losing all gains in the interim), or focusing that energy on actually learning to climb?  Just being logical.  
Are you supposed to have a button beforehand? 
In LoL you basically just grind nonstop and just gank or teamfight every now and then that last 30 seconds max. Thats like playing world of warcraft, and going to pvp for only 30 seconds, and leave. Then back to grinding, and then back to pvp.
Essie- Turquoise &amp; Caicos  OPI- Pros and Bronze
This is why my mom wouldn't let us have Berenstain Bears books when we were little, because they made the dad seem like such a moron.
Bizney World is not travel. It is where one goes when one has given up on the real world, given up on real travel, and given up ones soul to Satan in Hell.  I hope I live to see the day when Disney ceases to exist. It is a stain on our culture and a plague in the minds of the young.
You need to talk to a doctor/other professional, not the internet. Maybe a nutritionist? 
matrix.itasoftware.com  Always the best flight search.
Well, there was never really any time to try and judge Irvin or Aikman independent of the other triplets. 
I know it isn't common, but when people make fun of the deaf or sign language.  I have 3 deaf family members, and I'm fluent in sign language.  Just because they talk different than you doesn't mean they're stupid or retarded.  
I've heard that he's under 20 games away from earning a pension.
Boring. Next time shout your username. 
http://www.huffingtonpost.com/2013/01/31/gay-dog-euthanized-tennessee_n_2590537.html Truefax
"We've done everything we can to impede progress and people *still* don't like us? Is there no satisfying you people?"
I'm awesome
me
Oh god can we get off of the gays?  Who gives a fuck?  "Culliver's a bigot" "Suggs like gays better!!"'  who gives a fuck??!!!  Are we really competing to see who likes gays best now?  This is football, teams are made of people, some of them are dicks, some are gay some are not, what they think and how they feel is irrelevant.  CAN WE PLEASE TALK ABOUT FOOTBALL!
I actually bought a pair of different toned brown shoes from Kohl's once - didn't notice until I was at a bar about two months later and actually looked at my own feet.
Unfortunately, your submission has been removed for the following reasons:  * You did not include the image's resolution in the title. You should put the resolution in brackets at the end of your title.  For more information regarding these issues please  [see the FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/AbandonedPorn/faq), and feel free to resubmit once they have been resolved. Thank you!  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%23AbandonedPorn) if you have any questions or concerns.*
##SO MUCH  ####BRAVERY
Malonu tautietį matyt
I was hoping that story was going to go another way :(
I don't see a ton of that "Now thats what I call music" stuff anymore (with the radio stations (ie. Pandora, Spotify) playing top hits and Itunes making top hits and stuff it seems unnecessary). I have parent friends who rock the shit out of Kidz Bop though because it's still 'top' hits but without swear words or inappropriate language for kids.
Of course. I was addressing the groups OP mentioned, such as Native Americans, and not all marginalized people.
So it's a controversial opinion to prefer living in your own country to living in any other country in the world?  It seems pretty normal to me.  If you prefer living in another country besides your own, why wouldn't you move there?
I'm not entirely sure yet, as the course focuses on both elite sport (helping athletes to perform well in training/competition) and general exercise (helping the public be more active, psychological benefits of exercise etc). My dream job would be to work with athletes and sports bodies - I have heard that a graduate at the university I'm planning on going to managed to bag a job with F1's McLaren pit stop team (amazing stuff). But if not that, then I'd love to work with hospitals and councils on schemes to get people more active and doing sport.   The whole area of Sport and Exercise Psych is pretty new, and I really want to be out there, working with people - not stuck in an office at a desk all day!
Hey, easy on the rednecks. She ain't hurtin nobody.   My family's from the south, is it weird we find nothing wrong with that show other than their "sketti" recipe?
In my opinion, it's rarely worth it to meddle in someone's love life. Love is a bit blind, and generally, unless the advice is asked for, it either falls on deaf ears, or can cause a strain in the relationship. Your friend is better off just being there for their friend as needed. If the relationship is bad, it'll eventually end on its own. 
Please on my way to work this morning in Minot it was -25 ambient with a -55 wind chill.  Below -10 it all feels the same anyway. ;)
NPR?
They are very much paleo!
We were somewhere around Torrinos, on the edge of the hisec, when the boosters began to take hold.
Too bad they don't recall harmful or useless alternative medicines.
I think it's better for you to be with your kids now. If you can make it, why not.
Sunny rollins solo album
What do you do for mana? I find his 120+ mana costs on every spell to be extremely hard to deal with without Grail, Tear or RoA.
Are you using any external video mods(i.e. Optifine)? If you are, uninstall it. If you aren't, try updating your video card drivers.
His bollocks look fine and dandy
Also assuming that this is NOT on the iPhone 5. Poor karma whoring skills OP. Bad on you.   EDIT: I apparently managed to reply to you instead of making my own comment. Carry on Supposed. My bad
That goes down as the what-the-fuckiest .gif of the evening....
My boss is similar. What's worse is that I share an office with my direct supervisor. So what I get is "can you people come into my office?"
Trump was stirring up publicity for his reality show, not being serious. I mean, it did get everyone talking about him. He has donated money to both Hillary Clinton and Rahm Emmanuel, it's pretty clear he's just playing these birther country bumpkins for all they're worth for the ratings.
[Here is the Imgur link](http://imgur.com/ZZWj6lh)
Am I really the only one that knows this is obviously shopped?!
Oh man. That'd be really sweet if we were. You'd definitely instantly be my coolest brother.
lol well I guess its because Imin the bay area. Its the 49ers quarterback. I didnt know who he was either
I'll add it in!
I can't disagree that they were costly penalties this year. What I'm getting at is that regardless of what he said, he has changed his style enough to, at least, not get caught. He will only get better at controlling his temper (not getting UR penalties) and antagonizing others (causing UR penalties) next year. He's young in relation to snaps taken. So, the premise that many here take that he must be replaced, IMO, is ludicrous.  He fits into a Pete Carroll team perfectly. Look back at his USC teams. You will see that they were all big, long, tall and fast. Not all of them were stars, just a couple each year. But PC teams are built on a Gestalt philosophy of the whole being bigger than the sum of it's parts. Breno fit that to a T. 
Its really not...Most months are pretty creepy, all weird looking women with swords, but this one took the creepy cake fo sho.
Dat one is cat.
Oh god, I forgot how hot the villian from the new Alan Wake game was. Holy crap was he hot. I need to finish that game...
I don't see how they're going to differentiate between taxing diet fountain drinks and non-diet at places where the customer dispenses the drinks. At those places, everybody will just order diet soda and avoid the tax.  Also, since the nickel tax is on every 12 oz. quantity, does that mean places with soda fountains and restaurants with table service would have to stop offering free refills on soda? That I won't like. I'm usually good for one or two refills of diet soda with my meal.
I disagree with the quality of service. In Australia people are paid decent wages. Some places have tips on top of that. Either way, you're usually going to get good service. I've never noticed the quality being any better in places with tips than without. If everyone was paid a flat wage, they would still have to provide a certain level of customer service to keep their job.
Yup, this picture needs to be removed and OP needs to be reminded this is /r/amateur not /r/porn.
Taking it quite a ways back, but, bottled water. I couldn't imagine why anyone would pay for water and now I have one on me all day at work.
I elaborated later.  Do you think libertarians support every amendment?
Thank you :D
Yep no worries, just saying.
there's a shop about 2 blocks walking distance from amoeba. They specialize in punk/metal vinyls.. I forget the name but it's next to a starbucks
It does, yeah, because every community has its shitheads. The only reason they're more prevalent in games than in real life is because they don't have to risk physical injury or much by way of retaliation when they're online.  And no need to apologize. It's not your fault that some women wield their gender like a club just as it's not my fault that some men will incessantly send you pictures of their penis the moment they realize you have breasts.
He's got nothin' on Kent Bazemore, in terms of bench celebrations. Warrior fans know.
I don't disagree with how editing is done but they were not telling him and Bubba how to interact with each other. That was their own doing and that was the bit that made me think they were scum. They consistently huddled together and whispering behind the dude's back. You can say that is editing but it would be in complete contrary to the fact Bubba begins his sentence stating that it was immediately following Gilbert being upset over his flag. They came across as douche bags. I don't doubt that some of the editing made them look worst, but worst is the key word because they already looked bad.
THAT is complete bullshit... What, all of a sudden we need to fuck before we talk?
Just running around the game you'll find about 10.   They're a bitch to farm though, I found Fire reinforced club with power within to be the go. Got about 1 scale every 2-3 runs with 10 humanity, no CGSR, with the ring you should get 1 per run.
My dad did the same I finally figured out one day when I found a bandana with 3 joints he just grabbed them and headed to the garage we never spoke of it but other than that he's a good dad his smoking never was a problem it's better than drinking 
This is sweet! I hope you don't mind if I /x/post to /r/technology.  I think enough credit isn't given to China so far as the Sino-American invasion theory goes. I might not like how China runs things any more than how the US does, but I don't question China's effectiveness at "beating Westerners at their own game". China has the manpower to mass-produce the technology that will win the wars of tomorrow.  I don't *want* to see a Sino-American war, but *if* one were to manifest, I'd sure as hell want to speak Chinese. 
This is more than mildly interesting. 
You do realize the American's hatred of foreigners (save for a minority) is a joke right?  We're actually very amicable with others until we are attacked, then we pull out the guns to defend our honor. Duel at high noon?  Sabers, first blood?
Wow I remember the last time I fell for that one..
What are the speeds of the gears? Do you end up cruising at like 4000 RPM at 30 mph and 2000 RPM at 70? Only two speeds is baffling.
480 looks unbelievably shitty on a 73" TV.  I saw the 4K TVs at CES and I can't wait.  
I read that as "before he started meowing" like three or four times before I got it right. So confused.
I would say but it's not a big complex, just an old mixed use building. I will say it's within a 4 minute walk to the capital building.
Depends on how you feel about offing your mother...
Look at the link to this thread, well known famous news anchor editing footage and calling straw men "gun-worshiping fanatics." 
My Dovahkiin can't get hard for Lydia if he hasn't slaughtered a Thalmor patrol beforehand.
Some folks don't have checking accounts. /shrug
Here is what the linked Quickmeme image says in case the site goes down or you can't reach it: &gt;Title: Scumbag Steve browses in /new &gt;Meme: Scumbag Steve &gt;* LEAVES A COMMENT ON YOUR NEW POST  &gt;* DOESN'T GIVE YOU AN UPVOTE OR A DOWNVOTE &gt;^〘[Direct](http://i.qkme.me/3ssyrk.jpg)〙 ^〘[Background](http://imgur.com/tAe3e)〙 ^〘[Translate](http://translate.google.com/#auto||LEAVES+A+COMMENT+ON+YOUR+NEW+POST+-+DOESN%27T+GIVE+YOU+AN+UPVOTE+OR+A+DOWNVOTE)〙 [Why?](http://www.reddit.com/r/qkme_transcriber/comments/o426k/faq_for_the_qkme_transcriber_bot/) ┊ [More Info](http://www.reddit.com/r/qkme_transcriber/) ┊ AMA: [Bot](http://www.reddit.com/r/self/comments/vxeak/hello_i_am_a_bot_who_posts_transcriptions_of/), [Human](http://www.reddit.com/r/InternetAMA/comments/12gog9/i_am_the_creator_of_qkme_transcriber_a_definitely/) ┊ [Voted Bot of the Year 2012](http://www.reddit.com/r/truebestof2012/comments/160lrw/truebestof2012_winners/)
[](/abaww-r)I never dream anymore...
I haven't actually seen the picture (more out of not really caring than anything) but I thought it just said "pastor" as the signature? Or did I read a shitty article?
Or a few knocks on the wall and an educated guess
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=oeXxkLhFgn4&amp;list=PLB6D0F222AB996913  I hate him so much. He would medal in Olympic diving.
Clockwork Orange?
My scale doesn't show BMI, but it needs your height and age to calculate your bodyfat (along with the impedance), and I assume the algorithm includes your weight and is basically an equation fitted to collected data.
24-14 49ers, 815 yards. Both defenses show up big time, but the Kaeped Crusader and Sir Goresworth XXI run like fuckall, and the 49ers' offense gets in a groove before the Ravens' does.
Balls
The man from earth. it's a really beautiful movie.
I've been told this. Country music is my soul. ^^I ^^know, ^^I ^^don't ^^fit ^^in ^^with ^^Reddit  
Other than the oversight of not obscuring the name, I am quite impressed with Chelsea. She seems thoughtful and well-spoken. I hope she finds better employment very soon. It is difficult to find blame with Applebee's for firing her because she did post customer information online, but I certainly don't think she deserves to be out of a job. 
Shin Sekai Yori for this season.
I reaaaaly don't see why people like the anger, looks horrible imo, but nevertheless, for those who do, this is a great price.
This is how:   * [Evidence the first](http://www.reddit.com/r/tea_party/comments/17ldas/user_posts_scientific_description_of_africas/)  * [Evidence the second](http://www.reddit.com/r/Nationalism/comments/17ldad/user_posts_scientific_description_of_africas/)
&gt;Obviously women get more negative attention for gender because gasp they are the only ones who get offended by it.   Are you serious? It's because gaming is male dominated not because they get offended by it. It's because it's easy to relate to peers when you have the common denominator of mockery.  &gt;If you are asking who gets harassed more it's obviously men.  In gaming? Men are getting harassed for being men? 
As do I! Went through my closet the other day and easily had 100+ woot shirts. I'm an addict.
That read like Clockwork Orange.
I thought a bit more about this after I came home from work. You need to start EATING! NOW!  You are an active 22 yo woman? Then you will need between 2200 and 2400 kcal per day, probably in the higher range since you run 5 to 10 K per day. ([Here](http://www.cnpp.usda.gov/Publications/USDAFoodPatterns/EstimatedCalorieNeedsPerDayTable.pdf) is a link for reference)  Are you telling me you get 2400 kcal from *one single meal* per day? I say no way!   You have been in a constant deficit for 1.5 years and I believe you are actually starting to show symptoms of real starvation. **YOUR BODY IS TRYING TO TELL YOU SOMETHING - You need to listen before you do permanent damage to yourself.**
Haha, yea... no.
I haven't thought about trying a gray-scale yet, but I have gotten some requests, perhaps it's worth an attempt.
I'm glad people care about the ants. 
well i cant fuck your vagina cause its too big.
It is nice to hear some positive things while sifting through the comments. Thanks for participating!
CM, Bane, and Naga should be some heroes you'd like to run as they'll help set up easy Pudge hooks and let you initiate teamfights with ease or get free picks.
Not on mobiles.
We can change that rather quickly....then you will really feel like youre part of reddit.
Does this friend know your ex has feelings  towards them?  I'm sure that's really hard to deal with, I'm sorry you have to go through it.
*This conspiracy's context:* **[Thankfully my dad found them BEFORE he started mowing](http://www.reddit.com/r/aww/comments/17nbt0/thankfully_my_dad_found_them_before_he_started/)**  ^Did ^the ^bot ^make ^a ^mistake? [^Message ^me](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=KarmaConspiracy_Bot&amp;subject=Error:\%2017nt69&amp;message=Post\%20in\%20question:\%20http://www.reddit.com/r/KarmaConspiracy/comments/17nt69/redditor_finds_a_kills_animals_mother_only_to/\%0A\%0ACorrect\%20link:\%20) ^with ^the ^correct ^link ^- [^FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/KarmaConspiracy/comments/uu43r/rkarmaconspiracy_bot/)
I feel like you're someone I know....
I can respect the reasoning behind this, but I hate it, I think they should at least have you read through and agree to keep your current password.  I'm cautious with my accounts and have never had any of them 'hacked' as people claim.  So it's silly for me to change it. People just need to learn to not give their password out, or download crap that is labeled 'free'. Along with knowing there should be 3-5 passwords for 3-5 different types of security. (Gaming, emails, social networks, etc) 
but I'm not even close to republican, how are any jokes on me?
added on steam
Yo mama jokes.  My mom died of cancer when I was 18, a fact I obviously don't bring up often among strangers or coworkers.  I usually chuckle when I know the joke teller doesn't know, but I have dropped the bomb occasionally on people who are being shitheads for no reason.
Upvote for someone who knows how to stretch properly!
I was raped when i was 5 by a 12 year old.
Time Travel. I would use two for emergencies (to get back). The last one would be at least 50 years forward. Hopefully at a time where time travel exists!
It's nice to see people who are willing to help, especially in a game with such a vicious trading community...
But I'm Nathan...
2121
Jesus fuck, you are damn adorable, and yummy!
Grampa's always said "If you can't kill them with the first shot, you shouldn't have pulled the trigger."  My grandfather killed Nazi's with an old-school rifle, so can I.
&gt; It's certain?   For certainty their bullshit must be less than 5% of their argument, (b &lt; .05). 
I hear the Olympian Quest can net you gold, if you're the best. But a high Sta and Agl are requirements.
My woodies come in tomorrow. 1 day shipping because I live in the same town from where they're sent. :)
Maybe a strange part for wrangled kills?
It's been a pleasant surprise so far.
It was, at the time that it was produced. Similarly, muskets were, when the Declaration of Independence was written.  Feinstein can go eat a big bag of dicks.
But what about the man half of him? Does that sweat?
Theft doesn't need to be tangible. I can steal your ideas, your spotlight, your opportunities, your intellectual property, your wifi...  It doesn't matter if you intercepted the pass or stripped the ball - either way you have the ball now and he doesn't.
Sorry if this is a dumb question, but it looked like it had two dvi outputs, why wouldn't that work with two monitors? 
Fucking solitary cos some fucker lied to you, I hope you can move on and make something decent of your life, take care
it doesnt require webcam, you can sign in as a guest! its basically a chatroom with optional webcam
I am Amelia Earhart.
Sigh... thanks everyone. It's as I feared. I'll try to talk to her about it next time but I think I may need to look for a new laser place. Don't suppose there's anyone from Vancouver on here that can recommend a good laser place? 
So much better in slow motion while loading...
Nice lips
Am I the only one that ignores the fines just to get more loads in?
Guess not :S
I know what you mean. I'd be happy with a sense of scale, even if it took me a very long time to get somewhere. I want to HAVE to explore it. In Freelancer, although a terrible example, due to the nature of the RP Server it felt pretty big because we had to consider the impact we would have on travelling from one sector to another.   I'd love to have that feeling recreated.
There are other apps you could kill time with, like Temple Run. 
And then she surgically removed them
I'm no wizard at this stuff - but isnt' it just getting closer and closer to being tide-locked with the Sun?   Someone else can probably do the math, but given how slow it's spinning right now 6.5 minutes per year is nowhere remotely close to the energy required for, say, the eath to slow by 6.5 minutes per year.
What really pisses me off is Airborne.  It's basically just a vitamin supplement, but it's marketed as preventing/curing colds.  The reason this product (in particular) pisses me off is in regards to how it's advertised:  They tout that it was 'invented by a schoolteacher.'  Why would you want your medicine invented by someone with no background in medicine?  I wouldn't want to ride a plane invented by a plumber or live in a house designed by teamster.  Basically, the 'invented by a schoolteacher' line is a way of saying 'not invented by a doctor/pharmaceutical company.' 
"Bring dip."
They would need to establish a team and be successful as an independent or in a small conference for about a decade. They would also have to bring themselves up to speed in other sports.  All in all the entire process would cost hundreds of millions of dollars and probably 20 years. 
Well I guess I don't hate you that much, because I really want Denard on the cover.
We must make them fear us.
Reincarnation of the Zorro 
Blues brothers.
&gt;Did we lose any of our best players?  Yes, two of them, at the very end of the summer transfer window.  They were never replaced, and we're in 6th place as a result.  &gt;Anyone who has been an Arsenal supporter for more than 6 months will know that nothing much was ever going to happen in January.  Actually there was an enormous amount of chatter that we finally had enough of a bank balance to make the signings that would improve the squad, and Arsene has signed in January before (Reyes, Arshavin)  &gt;If we can consistently receive performances like second half Arsenal v Chelsea or Liverpool, we are capable of top 4.  Ha.  What possible reason do we have to believe we'll play this way consistently?  &gt;Even if we don't make the top 4 this season, our players are tied down to long term deals, and with new commercial deals the need to sell is not nearly as strong (even accounting for loss of Champions League money. None of the team except maybe Arteta are going to regress due to age, with most likely to improve over the next 12 months. Arsene will buy in the summer, he always does.  Being in the Europa League disbars you from a certain class of player, as Arsene knows every well.  Great players want CL football.
No, he said go, preach and teach, make disciples of women and men of all nations. 
I was in Argentina a few weeks ago. Official inflation figures are severely understated, so people save in Dollars or Euros to preserve their wealth, but since there are restrictions to the amount of foreign currency people can buy, and the exchange rate is fixed (well, actualy it floats across a very narrow band), there is a huge black market. The official exchange rate is 5 pesos x USD. The argentine friend with whom I was staying took me to a place where I could litterally auction my dollars, I ended up getting 7 pesos. Now, tell me if this is 40% undervaluation of the currency and the 25% inflation rates are propaganda. People with die again soon, trust me, that's what the argentines themselves believe.
Oh? I lived in Pear Orchard Apartments for six years. It was okay, I guess. 
Yeah I am not a big fan of hickeys either hand prints and bite marks are more my style, but I was just trying to include the tamer crowd. :)
I'll just link the one I always suggest: [Lyra and Bon-Bon](http://www.reddit.com/r/FightingIsMagic/comments/rbw3d/if_lyra_and_bonbon_were_a_type_of_tag_team/c44k1r6).
Buying the bundle exclusively for the skin is just dumb, especially if you already have the rest of the contents through other means. That places the cost well above any legendary skin, and higher than Pulsefire Ezreal (ignoring the RP contained in the pack, but even counting that it is still absurdly expensive).  Hippalus wanted to make the (now much improved) skin available to players in that situation, because it is not _worth_ the massive pricetag.
Thank so much! It's looking like I should wait on the Zia until I have a little better idea of exactly what fits me. I think I'm going for the Freya though, I can always take the band in just a touch. I'm jumping straight from stretched out 32s to 28s, so I bet I won't mind a little room.
All of the default subs. All of them.
Thank you :D
Well I do my personal stuff like my computer, and I probably will search for a job when I get out that has to Do with it. I set up a whole PA system.. I mean if anyone needed help building a radio I could do it lol or splicing telephone wires 
Why not both?
Time
Er, that would be what's called a live audience.
On the double packs I think he meant there's one on each pull out pack.
He is a legend http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=DcrnbHQxKiE
I think you've just answered your own question. There's no way PO would have done this without some sly encouragement from QPR.  I hope the bastards follow Portsmouth into relegation and administration for the way they've conducted themselves over the whole affair.
By trying to be the best person I can be, every single day of my life 
I pre-ordered it. Eh, the game is good when it works. It doesn't work very often, though.  Problem 1 (right after release): Game is so buggy it's unplayable, joining servers generally doesn't work  Problem 2: Locked out of my Origin account because of a bug, EA support is very unhelpful and even plain rude.  Problem 3: Can't connect to any BF3 servers.  Problem 4: Game's default maps are horribly designed  Problem 5 (current problem): I spawn with no weapons, rendering the game unplayable.
No, she deserved to get fired. You don't put up personal information on a site notorious for fucking with people, and the wrong people at that.
In late 2011 the memes started. By early-to-mid 2012 it was nothing but memes. In mid 2012 it became memes and every single tournament match result. I really don't care that some random guy from vVv won in the first round loser's bracket against some no-name player.  Then you have the witch hunting and over the top political correctness/seriousness. It's like a video game tabloid with cat pictures.
Yeah I try watching it every night after the simpsons.  It just doesn't work for me at all.  
That's good to hear! Most of it, anyways. I really like the UI of it, but it's a shame there aren't too many apps on it, though I'd be happy as long as I'd have Reddit, Facebook, and Twitter.
$700 almost new Haworth office chair that was missing a foot.  I fixed it with a projector foot that I wasn't using.  It's the most comfortable seat in my house.
It's older than dog.
He's a name that people recognize. And he only wrestles one match. It's truly a situation, like Tweakedenigma said-name recognition. It get folks to tune in that don't even know the wrestlers there, but once you're watching it-you realize its dome of the best wrestling we have on tv.
I too enjoy feeling smugly superior over new players by picking on their minor inaccuracies. It makes me feel like a big man alphanerd.
How do you stay hydrated?
Thanks for the spoiler alert.
Is there really no room for a litterbox wedged between the toilet and the wall?  I've lived in a dozen different apartments of all shapes, square footages, and qualities and with one exception, there has always been been room there.  Plus it makes it so much easier to clean if you get the flushable litter and just clean their box whenever you're done doing your thing.  In the place that didn't have enough room along side the toilet, the litterbox was kept in the shower.  Huge PITA since you have to move stuff around every day, but it worked.  Not having to vaccum up stray litter almost made it a decent trade-off.  Just turn on the water and it goes right down the drain.
http://1.bp.blogspot.com/_-JFUAhOWtTI/TOw9QME23-I/AAAAAAAAAPs/5Df8F8RdRUU/s1600/panic-button.jpg
Those are some manly nuts
Before you yell at me for not securing her, this is not her normal behavior.  She normally pretends to be a human in the passenger seat but on this day she was spooked by a dick in a car next to me so she climbed in my lap.  I took back roads and drove incredibly slow.
In America, those cops would have been wailing on him with their nightsticks.
You are hence forth tagged as "The Finder". Someday, maybe not today, maybe not tomorrow, but someday I may call on upon you for my stalking needs. 
HSV1 *CAN* be contracted from sexual activity.  It has a lot of the same symptoms but the likelihood of a second outbreak is low.  It is one of the most prevalent STDs in the world, and most adults that get it have no idea they have it or attribute the symptoms to something else. This means people can carry it and have no idea.  Condoms don't necessarily stop the spread because it is transferred by skin-to-skin contact.  Source: I got HSV1 from having sex with a girl that I'd been seeing on and off. I used a condom EVERY time, still got it. It's painful for about 2 weeks, I had flu symptoms and fever. Really sucks. But it's not going to kill anyone. It's just a minor inconvenience in the grand scheme of things. 
Sounds like every ghetto in America.
Though his W introduces a certain degree of depth.
I never open Origin. Battlelog, although kind of annoying, is all you need.
To be fair, the guttural consonants in Hebrew (which are a defined set whose presence affects phonology) are a pretty arbitrary set of sounds.
All the real nigga subreddits are dying. /r/skateboarding and /r/HipHopHeads used to be the GOAT. 
I'd say they're both equally saddening. Both groups deserve to live.
I understand what you're saying.  Just to clarify, when I say make it a nursery, I was not planning on painting it or anything like that.  It has a  neutral wall color (it's cream-colored right now) and I was going to leave it like that and just use furniture, bedding, etc to decorate.  My thinking was that a nursery is a bedroom, it's just a bedroom for a little person, but I guess people don't think of it that way. 
Corgis are like the hobbits of dogs. 
This one goes out to you Bill!  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=5nCzoctvEcQ
"Yolo"
Nice, I have a very similar armor set on my warrior. (Same shoulders and Boots, which really set up the look for the armor)
Maybe chrome is just the first of the browsers. Next will be bronze or gold or lithium or aluminum or *gasp*..... Steel 
Thanks
Yea, there's always a bitter old fuck in any neighborhood. The ones that act out to validate their existence are always awful.
The next town over from me which is only 10km away gets it this year and I get it next year.  Oddly enough the town 10km in the other direction from me is hopefully getting it within the next 5 years but there is no set date yet.  I'm stoked that its being rolled out and that I will get it much sooner than most people, but the way they're rolling it out by bouncing all over the place seems pretty stupid.
it's a book by this guy, is M. le President (Jean) Bouhier  http://books.google.co.uk/books?id=p7wWAAAAQAAJ&amp;printsec=frontcover&amp;source=gbs_ge_summary_r&amp;cad=0#v=onepage&amp;q&amp;f=false  This book is poems of petronius, probably similar to http://books.google.co.uk/books?id=pp9AAAAAcAAJ&amp;source=gbs_similarbooks   the Editor is M. D'oreille, d'ord(?)ille professor in amsterdam [ is probably lettered in ] latin poetry.. ( xx xxx des poësies?latines?)   nb Royal Netherlands Academy of Arts &amp; Sciences used to have a yearly latin poetry prize... http://fr.wikipedia.org/wiki/Certamen_poeticum_Hoeufftianum  [edit] found some other citations, 99% sure that the v. is short for voir (see) Papillon (referring to l'abbé (Abbot) [Papillon](http://fr.wikipedia.org/wiki/Philibert_Papillon)) and then it tells you where in the two-volume Collected Works of the Burgundy Authors (*Bibliothèque des auteurs de Bourgogne*) (in this usage Bibliotheque means collected works) you would find the Poems of Petronius listed (don't know what J.I. means, but then references pp 82/93 and 89
They do but at the same time how would they do it?  Yes i understand you can only loot Sha once a week but raid info doesnt show 'loot' but only 'kills', and since you can kill Sha a million times if you wished.
Get a Toro froth to froth, or if thats too little drag get a 7arm to froth
That pitbulls have locking jaws....
i want to have Leon's babies
My point is that it was entirely luck, so yeah, anyone could.
It's painful to think someone has to use these tactics to create some fucking order. Unfortunately people are pretty messed up and the cycle continues with their kids. Boooo.
Its not that i dont, its the fact that look at what anonymous did to the govt files and such. They hacked them, not wise to give any information out at all. About anything. i just dont want it to be someone that is looking for a way to get any info on them. So giving any out is a really bad idea
It's supposed to be a worker that has commited suicide by hanging.
It would be helpful if you provided a link.
Upvote for proper meme use. ^^*Asshole*
The way I read that is "don't share with 20 people and she'll be at your bed tonight"... Yes, I have weird fetishes.
Can you post a picture of the pattern you use with your vortex? I'm curious now.
Why does Nancy capitalize everything? I don't like the cut of her jib. 
**Original Submission (100%):** [Atlanta Security guard with some BALLS, running off...](http://www.reddit.com/r/videos/comments/17n18r) [[D]](http://youtu.be/K09gk5RK510) **[NSFW]**  **Posted:** 6h before this post by *[BD2600](http://www.reddit.com/user/BD2600)* (fixed by *[agressivstreetlamp](http://www.reddit.com/user/agressivstreetlamp)*)  *Link not posted to same subreddit: [videos](http://www.reddit.com/r/videos) -&gt; [ImGoingToHellForThis](http://www.reddit.com/r/ImGoingToHellForThis)*  [This comment generated by an automated bot.](http://www.reddit.com/r/originalfinder/wiki/index) [*Is this match wrong?*](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?subject=Error%3A+17nueq&amp;to=original-finder&amp;message=%2A%2AIncorrect+match%3A%2A%2A+http%3A%2F%2Fwww.reddit.com%2Fr%2FImGoingToHellForThis%2Fcomments%2F17nueq%0A%0A%2A%2ACorrect+match%3A%2A%2A)
Reminds me of that one episode of Malcolm in the Middle.
I know this isn't relevant to anything at all, but I love your user name. That man made my childhood significantly better with his amazing books.
There are ALWAYS more ways you can spend more money. You can have the more expensive wine. Or upgrade to first class. Or get that extra option on the car. That's the way the world is setup.  And yes, I think there is a balance between "spending ALL the money now" and "save ALL the money for later." However, I also think that western culture is not setup properly to allow its people to make properly educated decisions regarding this.  I mean, yes, the question is: What will make you happy?  What makes me happy is knowing that if I get into a horrible accident right this minute, I'll be able to live ok. I know that if I have children in the future, I will be able to fund their education AND not depend on them for retirement.  Yes, eating well and living well also makes me happy. But to me, eating at a $30/person restaurant pretty much brings me max enjoyment. I don't enjoy the $100/person restaurant any more than the $30/person restaurant. And I love homemade food. I also know that having a reliable car makes me happy, but will that $100k Porsche make me happy? No, it wouldn't. I want to live in a nice home. But I actually don't want more than 800 sq ft (which I found out after living in 1000 sq ft). And I don't want to live in a house (which I found out after purchasing a house). And I have traveled internationally, both in $700/night hotels (paid for by a relative) and sleeping on a friend's hard concrete floor with a camping pad. I actually didn't enjoy the holiday with the expensive hotel room more.  Another thing I want to point out is that I enjoy my job. I enjoy going to work (and it pays me fairly well too). I enjoy haggling and buying second hand items as a scavenger hunt/challenge for myself. I also enjoy making things, from furniture to electronics to clothing (to food, somewhat). I enjoy maximizing my dollar, for the most part. So a large part of me day-to-day enjoyment is things I do at work, and things I make at home. I don't need to spend nearly all that much money to make myself happy.  Things I do splurge on (and it's a lot): Skiing (I buy new last-season's skis on clearance, and season's pass). Housekeeping (I hire a housekeeper to come clean regularly.) Clothing and shoes (I spend ~1% of my gross income on clothing and shoes.) Artisan cheese, and good food in general. We host parties regularly, where we provide all the food and alcohol, and it is delicious too. I think we have a really nice place to live, but it's under 13% of my gross, if my boyfriend decides to stop working tomorrow and I have to pay for the whole thing. Oh, and I bought a new car 2 years ago, and spent $450 on a camera recently to try out photography. And theater; I'm a season subscriber to 3 play/musical theaters.  Things I do not splurge on: Eating out. Drinking (though I have a stocked bar, it's only for parties). We don't have cable or phone bills. We pay the basic for internet and computers. My boyfriend and I have only one car between us. We don't travel much, and when we do, it's usually combined with our work travel plans.  This year, I plan to increase my net worth by 40% of my gross income.  (I have also lived beyond my means. I have spent $3k in one month on eating out. And lived in a one-bedroom apartment with a view. I traveled multiple times a year to places that weren't even that interesting to me. It did not make me happy.)
You guys do a great job modding /r/gaming, but you need help. There currently only 7 mods in /r/gaming. You can't catch all the shitposting, specially during the mornings, you guys are asleep, I can tell :P  /r/pics/ is as massive as /r/gaming and has 22 mods! And their content is not that bad for a huge default subreddit. 
Watch the news video posted above.  It clearly states it is a pistol and it shows it.
I'm the kid of parents who had a rather large grow op when I was younger.  They never let me in the grow room, it was locked. They just said "I'll explain when you're older" when I inquired about it.   When I was 14 they told me the whole story, and the importance of not mentioning it ever. They also said they don't want me trying someone elses raunchy bullshit weed. So at 14 I had my first joint with my mum. I could have any whenever I wanted until I was 17 when they stopped growing. When it's not taboo, it's really not that exciting. I must've only smoked up a dozen times. They spoke to me about the importance of paying attention in school, and that I can't smoke until after school.
I paid $4k cash for a '99 VW Passat, two years ago, when it had 132k miles on it (around 10k per year, insanely low). Go fuck yourself you piece of shit.  
Bookmarked for research.
I have found that I am a better rider since I have been riding my WR250R.  How do you like your WR450F vs. your KTM 690 Enduro?  I'm actually considering the WR450R and the KTM 690 Enduro.  If I bought the WR450R, I'd make it street legal.
Nice! Wish they'd unlock my Xperia TL bootloader...
You could just... oh,  I don't know... unsubscribe. 
If two people get in a fight, I can easily take the stance that "fighting is bad" without saying that either one of them is correct.  It's silly to think otherwise.  Also, if Zionism is such a secular movement, then why are their desired borders defined by verses in the Bible?...
Your submission has been removed because you have failed to meet our video posting guidelines. For further information on how you can avoid this situation in the future, please read [this post on the topic of Youtube spam](http://www.reddit.com/r/blackops2/comments/133s2d/rblackops2_youtube_spam_guidelines/).  **Information:** After reviewing your posting history, it was found that:  * 100.00% of your total contributions to Reddit have been links to Youtube. * 100.00% of your total contributions to Reddit have all pointed to videos that were uploaded by the Youtube account **swergyisgod**.  - - -   ^This ^comment ^was ^posted ^by ^a ^bot ^| ^Has ^the ^bot ^made ^a ^mistake? ^Contact ^the ^moderators!
Couldn't your friend have just asked for the paycheque to be reissued?
Yes we did, just about everything cleaned off her dress (which was black, thankfully) just the shame shadowed me the rest of the night.
*Prays to God that she's one of the hot chicks that are actually good at video games.*
I totally agree. 
literally no one ever claims his except for kids who are like eleven.
Tangata!
being the first black president is an accomplishment.  being a girl who plays video games is not an accomplishment.
Around this time last year they were also patting themselves on the back for their altruism by donating a money for every up vote their post got. 
OP also believes that we remember Shakespeare mostly for his great fart jokes.  [Here's a whole site dedicated to that memory](http://ultragross.blogspot.com/2011/04/fart-jokes-of-william-shakespeare.html).
I came here to find out about these issues, too.
Get a haircut.
As a Winterhawks fan...  *it's on*
He's this kind of atheist: http://imgur.com/42GuPxt
Finishing all my homework before going to bed. :3
Lance Armstrong
Freight shipped.
I get around 4-8% on those machines, how accurate are they really? There's no way I'm 4% bf. 
Properly functioning prosthetics, deus ex style.  We're long overdue dammit. One can hope.  Oh and true holographic displays - already in existence but require a lot of processing power atm.
Damn that's so awesome. I'm really glad for you man. :)  I recently found out my mom smokes too. I went back home, I live in a different town for college, a week or so before thanksgiving break and I decided to quit around this time because smoking gave me bad anxiety/depression, whatevs.   Around comes Thanksgiving break and I'm home again, and one day, I decide to chill at a friend's house. I was feeling pretty tired, so I decided to head back home. I stop at a stop sign to text my friend to see if he wanted to hang out the following day. As I take a left, I approach a stoplight. I admittedly roll through it, and all of a sudden I see the infamous blue and red lights along with that dreaded sound no ent wants to hear. "Whoooooop" or something.  Long story short, he pulled me over for running both the stop sign and the stop light, which was bullshit. He smelled "cannabis" in my car, when it wasn't, it was just cigarette smoke. And he found a roach. I was fucking scared shitless. Note, I want to be an English teach, so this isn't good for me. He said, he was going to just write me a "ticket" because it was so little.   Apparently, it was my mom's and her boyfriend's. She must've left it there from months ago, she said. She smokes for menstrual cramps. We had a very real mother-son moment there in the living room. She said, "I didn't want to tell you until you found it on your own, I know you weren't going to be an idiot about it and this is my fault." And she cried and I cried and we hugged for what seemed like forever.   Apparently, she smoked for all her life. My grandma, her mom, knew, my dad knew, my aunt, etc etc. I also found out my mom, who divorced my dad, tried smoking with my dad a couple of times but he got too paranoid. So, I guess I know where I get THAT from now.  TL;DR: Caught with roach by cops, mom admits it was hers. We bonded.
Looks great!  HAPPY CAKEDAY!
I am not talking about me.
Man the northwest has such a killer doom scene. Super jealous.
discriminant Zr/Y ratios from tholeiitic to calc-alkaline   Ab/An ratios of the various compositions of plagioclase  diagnostic metamorphic paragenesis for pelites vs volcanics at a given metamorphic grade  name two world-class deposits of a given ore deposit type  If some drinking is involved, asking to mime specific fold interference patterns is always a hoot.
God.
I had a similar experience in a College astronomy class. It was several years ago, so forgive me if I am a little foggy on the details. We were discussing the size and age of the universe, and when we got to the big bang, one student started laughing. The professor stopped and asked him what was wrong, and with that same confused/mocking smile described in OP's post, he simply said "Do you believe in god?". I was floored by the innapropriate nature of the question in relation to our class discussion, but the professor answered calmly "This is a class that deals with scientific fact. This is not the place for a discussion on theology.", and continued with the class. The student tried several more times to disrupt the discussion, but was ignored. He must have dropped the class, because I never saw him back after that.
No, unless I'm getting something else then I'll pass. That's a huge ripoff. 
I actually quit June of last year to go to Mexico for the summer. Working nights really gives you a bit of freedom. 
And you have the most beautiful women. Quit bragging. Damn my shitty location.
I was wondering what had happened to Mason Ryan... 
I don't do things by halves. 
I have a friend who's partner was diagnosed with OCD. He has a hard time going out in public or working because of it. I have another friend who knows this, &amp; always mentions how 'OCD' she is because she has to turn off the lights when she leaves the room or something.  Also siblings &amp; coworkers who say "I'm going to kill myself" when the printer doesn't work or they don't get something they want. I CAN'T TELL IF I SHOULD TAKE YOU SERIOUSLY. I suppose just joking about mental health in general is upsetting.   As well, when I see out-of-town friends or relatives and they remark "You look great! You've lost weight". I have NEVER lost a noticeable amount of weight. Whenever I hear this 'compliment' I can't stop thinking "You think I'm fat. You think I SHOULD be losing weight. You actually think I should have a problem with my weight". Same thoughts occur when thin friends mention how gross and fat they are. If YOU are gross and fat at 100 lbs what must you be thinking of me.
That's quite a shpedoinkel video.
shouldve turned off the axes
Tiny photobucket photo is tiny.  Also, upload crap to imgur, not photobucket.
I don't usually put emotes in non-pony subs, but I frequent /r/roosterteeth, /r/Internet_Box, /r/hockey, and /r/HITsWorthTurkingFor.
Every once in a while they'll post up something mildly interesting, but it's pretty damn rare.
I disagree. I loved blowing shit up with fire crackers, smashing worms, setting booby traps but even me and my friends wouldn't have been stupid enough to fuck with a real gun if we found it. 
But not as much as I hate it. Going there to slaughter as many people as I can now. Screw this, the can have a real reason to hate me now. 
I think he is extremely introvert. He didn't really had any friends while he raced at Rabobank either.
Live down the lake from there, great looking place.  What are your opinions on ACC vs Barton Creek?  Looking into joining one.
Holy shit, never heard of day-fines. Why is this not in the U.S.?  Right now, all our fines do is result in a small dent in wallets for rich people, and for middle/lower class fuck us over.
Yes, I would assume most could tell the difference.
gta 4 complete for skyrim
Or at least some clothes.
Ya its pretty hilarious, most enemies will go attack that and completely ignore you, plus I think you get like 20 casts per bonfire.
What if SC2 got rid of stacking of units. Would that help with the way the armies work? I'm thinking of stacking air units mostly.
FRENCH KISSING ISNT FRENCH
Vomit. The tattoo-age and the 'OMG, look how cute I am when I say things' age should not overlap.
Pun in title
Its live:  http://www.windowsphone.com/en-us/store/app/puggle/62a36c5a-087c-467e-9ca0-658a9604ea4b
*Hello, Gad, if you do not mind me calling you as such.*
a moby dick
&gt;while the pastor has no repurcussions.  I don't get what you think Applebee's is supposed to do. 
The behind the monitor lighting that changes? Different strips, or same kit? Would you have a link?
Blood has a lot of Iron in it. Magnets placed over certain junctions in your arteries can help improve blood flow
Suddenly ballsack
Perhaps try using a Calm spell/scroll?  Ravenrock/Solstheim is like that. A guard once got in the way when I was fighting a dragon in own, and now the entire town is murderous against me. No jail options or anything like on the mainland. I had to reload a previous save. 
Cool. I'll probably eventually change my reddit name. But for now that helps =)
So, in the end, none of them were logical or very plausible in terms of science in time travel, but BTTF succeeds in steering you away from that fact while Looper does not. It did to me because from the start, and all throught, I was very interested in where it was going to happen next. By the time the Joes have that conversation it was already in my mind as old Joe was saying it.
Of course it's not legal. Is this a trick question? File a complaint with your state wage and hour department or the federal department of labor.
Yup, how can you have such bad quality control? 
Most people dont have forks in their bathroom...just saying.
Time is irrelevant, just show them that each n-by-n square is a slice out of the n-by-n-by-n cube. Once they understand that, tell them the n-by-n-by-n cubes are slices out of the n-by-n-by-n hypercube. 
I was thinking more along the lines of sexism.
I was pretty upset that got cancelled, too. I was also pretty upset that the sketches sucked. I kept staring at the tv screaming at Mark McKinney to get on the actual writing staff and fix things up. 'Cause the rest of the show was great.  But, 30 Rock is pretty awesome.
[Take that.](http://gifs.gifbin.com/052009/1241795697_slo-mo-blowing-raspberries.gif)
I work in the luxury hotel industry. I've known a few concierges who got fired for this.
[It's pretty cool!](http://cdn.idolator.com/wp-content/uploads/2010/10/Picture-21.jpg)
It looks like Kevin Durant at 4:43
I tried that, worked like a charm.
Uranium density: 19.1 g cm^-3 Radioactive waste/year: 81000m^3 (source: http://www.world-nuclear.org/info/inf04.html) Price/kg: $54,000,000 Note: I expect this is considerably cheaper than NASA spends, hence them trying to get this sort of thing up and running  Which comes to a grand total of $83.54 quadrillion per year or $10 trillion/hour. (http://www.wolframalpha.com/input/?i=19.1g%2Fcm^3*81000m^3*%2454000000%2Fyear%2Fkg) (http://www.spacex.com/falcon9.php)  EDIT: And THEN you have to take account of safety.
Faith in humanity actually restored
I think most people here were in that position... I identify myself with you a little... I just have to suck it up and move on. It's hard I know, but it's something we OWE it to ourselves...
Chipper did pretty well with the move too
Or Dwight Stephenson. 
When I play my low level, I tend to just mess around on a new champ or build, and provide advice to the new players in the game.   However, once someone on the other team starts ragging on my teammates or theirs for being "trash" or "fknoobs", I put the tryhard pants on and stomp them. Oh how silent they go after...
Ideally, you'd add one more of each.  But yes, it is true that different species of cory school in nature, but each such school consists of hundreds of individuals of each species. However, this is generally not feasible to do in home aquariums. And cories of different species will generally be just fine in the company of other cories of similar size, regardless of species. :)
&gt;A tractor or combine rig costs $150-300k  And that's not even the *pricey* options.  Farm investments is right around $1200/acre, and most farmers have a few hundred acres.
"Wtf is going on here?"
Is there any money in transporting goods into wormhole space for corps like yours?
I have also seen this watch with blue/red/green/maroon/white/cream dials, also with sunburst and textured dials. Definitely a lot of variety and they all look classic. 
Not sure what you mean, but I'll take your word for it.
Make your crust out of ramen noodles... crunch them up and add some corn chips, like fritos.  Cook them in as little water as possible and spread the remaining "dough" on the said chip bag.  Put the bag on the hotplate on low, and cook that baby up and add whatever toppings you have.  
Was your apology accepted!? ಠ_ಠ
I know, right? I don't even feel the slightest bit of shame saying that!
Thought she was dead in the first pic.
Meetup, eh? I'll bring the corn. (Really, though, I had no idea this subreddit even existed. Interesting!)
I'm pretty convinced that lubbyists are keeping the entire US-scissor/penis relationship going
[Razer Blackwidow Stealth](http://www.razerzone.com/store/razer-blackwidow-stealth-edition)  But it has the same design flaw as the Das Silent, USB ports on the right side, and might interfere with your mouse depending on your desktop setup.   Edit: Probably should note that the Razer has 1 USB port compared to the Das's 2 ports. 
le 9gag is my le favor[ent] lol   That said, my quarrel with men's rights advocates isn't that they aren't coated in memes (ironically, they tend towards mantras far more than I'd be comfortable with even were I to share their blighted sentiment), but rather that they are, on the whole, blind to our shared privilege and needlessly contrarian.   Try again, M. Troll.
reeepoooost
We'd love for you to try Uber once you get here! :) www.ditchyourkeys.com has a code for your 1st Uber ride free. I hope you enjoy Seattle as much as I do!
no thanks
&gt;And being like Jaysus means hating everyone who isn't exactly like you, wagging your finger in sanctimonious judgement, and kicking their asses when they dare to defend themselves.  Exactly.  Well said, and have an upvote for taking the words out of my mouth.
Come to IRC : ) http://www.tripsit.me/chat/drugs
I thougt that's what everyone was referencing.
Yea fuck this I'm takin my reservations to fuckin Chili's.
Ironically spending too much is bad too (spending &gt;50% of your available credit hurts you).  Although, I don't believe that paying them off hurts you, as long as you keep using it (i.e. don't leave it at 0 balance all the time).
This guy need a raise for the work he's putting in
I've had a 1476xp defeat, just two days ago.. Was not a scout though, was a T34.
10 Yard Fight
It's in your username, asshat. ;)
Don't you guys mean "LL?"
Yep, the patient is getting healthier. Well done :) 
Okay girl, COCONUT OIL. I use the shit for everything. It has made my hair shiny and voluptuous. It has made my skin softer and more supple than it has ever been, and it doubles as a makeup remover. I have used it on my eyelashes and they have grown thicker and longer within a few weeks. It also makes for awesome pot edibles.   I recently discovered that you can shave with it. I have been using it to shave my legs and vulva and I have been incredibly pleased with the result. It makes the shaving smooth and easy and leaves my skin feeling soft and moisturized, and it smells DELICIOUS. Since I started using it, I haven't had a problem with ingrowns. I moisturized my legs and vulva every night, and the hair is growing back very soft and manageable. Even if you don't intend to shave with it, I highly recommend picking up a jar. It's awesome. 
&gt;So what if that type of thinking threatens the well being of his fellow citizens?
&gt;17: Self-righteous people who refuse to believe scientific evidence that contradicts what their faith tells them to believe.  No words...
Good luck man! Post some periodic shirtless pics on r/progresspics to track progress because you won't notice changes on a day-to-day basis in the mirror.
I LOVED that game when I was 11 or so... Played the hell out of it until one day my mom just happened to notice that there was the option for a 'Mass Kill" and decided she would relate it to he holocaust... I didn't get to play much after that.
It seems like something he'd say: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=XhyHlKHIeZY
Will do!!
I'd honestly go with the shotgun
"Sorry I reamed your ass. Hope these make you feel a little better"
I too am a (soon to be retired) US Army soldier. I do it for the fun and the money. However, I also acknowledge that the things I've done haven't made the world a better place or my family any safer. I would be thrown in prison if I did these things without the US Government's protection. I have certainly sacrificed, but only for my own benefit. I respect the things you've done for your family, the military really does care for its own. But that doesn't change the things I've done and taken part in. The dead people don't care why I did it.
Such are the costs of "Team Building Exercises".
My girlfriend despises Australian accents with an unusual fury. While I find them kind of cute, don't assume that they are universally pleasant... they are sort of whiny (in a nasal way) and sound semi-retarded.
Came to ask if this was Keystone. Mozart, possibly? Anyway nice pic.
Lost some SR starters last year and this Year. Last year only managed to snag one OL in long and now he is gone.  All of this years class is pretty much tweeners who need to put on weight, converted TE/DL to OL. 2/3 stars.  Great coach and System will only do so much.  Your guys already have the weight/experience our current crop need to build up before they start. 
Harry potter and the Whatever
True... but the money has to be paid to maintain and run our society. 
Someone subscribes to quartz.
I guess.  After a few wears is not as bad. 
Good thing all aspects of your life are above reproach.  Otherwise there might be a karma payback a-comin' 
Well, wouldn't pooping count as sitting down to rest in silence for a few minutes?
I grew up with this album. First heard it when I dug my dad's cassette tape version out of our basement and popped it in my boom box at age 13. Got me through my hellish teenage years and I still love and know every song by heart. Have been deeply considering getting a tattoo of one of their little caricatures inside the lyrics book for this album.
I can hear his skates from here
"protect ya neck" - wu tang clan
Was just about to submit this. Fantastic song and video!
To be fair, the evidence is readily available. This is the 21st century for crying out loud and this is still a debate?!? It is easy to understand, they just don't want to. If they question that, they question the bible and basically their whole religion is based around original sin, lose that, and you lose the guilt that drives the religion and controls their followers.   but yeah, it is all about their education. when 40% of US believes in this you have a serious problem, one that will hold the nation back until it is rectified. 
No, in that case, I'm supporting the studios. I've seen more than a few reports on that that show that the artists don't see a dime from the levy.
Art's a tricky subject, because unlike most other forms of creative expression (books, films, music, for example) the original piece itself is what commands the price, and that really messes with the economics. With a book, it's pretty simple. People buy the book because they want to read it, and their owning the book doesn't prevent anyone else from owning it. You can copy the book, and each one has the same value. The same is true of films: you can keep screening it and each person will pay the same to view it.  The difference between these and art is that while books and films are funded by a large number of people paying a small amount (allowing commercial success to be reasonably equated with popularity), sales of art focus on selling a single original for a large sum of money. It's a very different business model, and the fact that only one person ever owns what's considered to be 'the' piece of art (whilst thousands can own the book) means that the commercial aspects of art are necessarily separated from ordinary consumers. I think it would be premature to conclude from this that a piece of art is not 'worth' £10,000 - if an artist creates a work, and an author writes a book, with the later selling 1000 copies at £10 each, who's to say they're not equally valuable items? - but I think the total isolation of the viewing public from the actual valuation of artwork is something that's definitely worth considering. I think it's actually very reasonable for people to feel uncomfortable about the excess of one person paying millions for a painting which they could buy an arbitrarily precise copy of for just tens of pounds. There's a definite element of pride involved - the painting being 'yours', and yours alone - which doesn't impact other forms of creative endeavour. Nobody can selfishly hoard music, but one can selfishly hoard art.
I will definitely like a couple. I'll send money to you.
[I feel it](http://i.imgur.com/dV7AJt1.png)
I know, right? It also hurts my soul that 15 year olds these days listen to Justin Bieber and not Queen and The Beatles.  Man, fuck my generation. I was born in the wrong decade.  EDIT: My God, Reddit must be pretty dumb today if they can't see through my sarcasm.
Take some pointers from Left 4 Dead when it comes to the sound department. Take some pointers from Project Zomboid as well. I would love to hear some poor survivor set of a whole hellish quire of city zombies, their roars and screams and wails ringing through the night. Perhaps setting of other packs in a kind of chain reaction. Imagine that while hunkering down with a heat pack in some abandoned building during night.  There is much that can be done with ambiance and sound. Mabey take a few steps away from the bare realism of the Arma engine and move towards a more artistic approach?
I don't know how I missed this when you first posted it, but you've got a new dA watcher!   I'm also thinking about reworking the CSS theme and metaljellyfish mentioned you might be down to contribute some of your art?
I would rather have an AMA from the backstage goddesses. Yespls. 
Thanks all for your comments and PMs.  I asked about rewriting the lease agreement to include a month to month clause but was refused on the basis of the offer of a monthly rate by the landlord.
im on a x60 tablet pc i got off craigslist for $120. slow as hell but the thing is damn near indestructible, even for having a single hinge design.
Wonder if he used to sneak into the girls locker room to secretly record them changing and then fap to it back then.
I own the Nemo Losi 3 and it's the biggest, awesomest three man tent I've ever used. I second the recommendation of the Big Agnes Fly Creek 2, I use it as a solo tent and I've seen several backcountry rangers with them. I sell tents for a certain store and I have sold several Nemo Motos to people who aren't looking for the lightest tent, but rather the smallest. I get people who are biking or motorcycle touring and they need something to fit in the tiny panniers they have. The Moto fits the bill since it packs down to the size of a cantalope. So far I haven't had a single Moto returned.
Just finished the game.  I also highly recommend this game.  There is not much actual game-play in the game but I feel the story more than makes up for it.  If you are the type of gamer that values character/story, then definitely pick this game up. If anyone is on the fence on buying this, wait until it goes back on sale.
This should be a rare random event of some kind in SA to warn of immense danger heading your way, just like that scene in the day after tomorrow, but zombies.
My 5 and 4 year sons wanted a Minecraft birthday party this year(They will be 5 and 6) Thank you for the WONDERFUL ideas.. I love they Creeper treats. 
Many high schoolers and college students do.
I've never heard anyone seriously accuse a cop of 'police brutality' after he tased someone who assaulted him, which is what the security guard did.
Amazing. Google her.
Ganda - the people there  Buganda - their kingdom. The reign of the Ganda people.  Luganda - the language of the Ganda people. 
if you can afford any of those cars besides the miata, im sure a 10 over speeding ticket doesn't really worry you. 
I can read arabic, and of course, English, and it doesn't look like it makes any sense, either way. That first big ol thing would either be a haa marbuta or a meem, but in English, it's definitely a Q or an O.   What is your name?
Well thank God they promised to stop! That's almost as good as not being bigoted fucks in the first place.   What should have happened: every official in the school district gets fired and all schools in the district are banned from competing in any sporting events for 5 years. The school officials for having the audacity to ban a *book*, and the sporting ban because any student old enough to be affected by the ban should have been protesting the school district the second they found out about it. We need to teach children about the importance of civil disobedience, and it starts with books in the school library.   I'm sick to hell of this bullshit. I don't care why they banned the book, it could be the God-damn Anarchist's Cookbook for all I care, you **do not get to ban books if you are a public school. Period.**  
I've recently gotten so sick of hearing it that I usually pop back at the person and ask if it was God's plan for the tragedy to happen. It either shuts them up, or I get a response along the lines of his mysterious ways. To which I respond, "Your God is a bastard."
So...you do want to know what the respondents genitals are?   ***Why?***
Performed in collaboration with Chris Thile on mandolin
lol, I feel you friend. I sometimes feels special with Judgement Kayle when I play with my friends that are just starting out. If I were you, I'd be using that Annie in wonderland skin everyday after the rework come out.
BC does not protect against STI's.
Haa! I watched that movie in my geography class ages ago..what's the name of it?  "I speak bushman!"
My wife bought me a couple sizes of these for my birthday (I *love* them): http://photojojo.com/store/awesomeness/lens-cap-strap-holder/
You're American, right? I say that because here in Australia, I've never had an issue with 'forced religion'.  It's really unfortunate for you guys, but don't let it make you narrow minded towards other humans, if you can.
this looks fun!
Now that Alanis, is irony.
Dentistry.
Por que no los dos!
Stress can definitely provoke seizures in people diagnosed with epilepsy, but it depends on the individual and type of epilepsy they have.
This is the biggest tune ever. Dani's part is heavy as fuck. 
Cueva de Lobos is a fun bar with cheap food and even cheaper drinks. They have food and drink specials daily and a really friendly staff.  Gorman Street Pub has pretty excellent food in my experience, and is a great place to watch sports. Not a huge tap variety, but a good bottled selection.
I am pretty sure they already have. Someone posted about it a few days ago. 
the scary part is that *you* can vote.
Thankfully, I browse Reddit from the safety of my lair. NSFW links everywhere!
Not nearly as much as the other guy.
I agree, if I hadn't been working on something for a month now I wouldn't feel comfortable entering with something knocked together in a couple of days.
Their entire careers
May you be known for your scenic melon fields and an underground Meloncotta army museum more than your molon lords. I will definitely visit if those two things become reality :D
So governments want to control names now? Fucking shameful. Stop butting into our business and start serving your people by building infrastructure and keeping your people's livelihoods secure.
That sounds like the perfect plan. Motorcycles have their benefits and draw backs. Great gas mileage but terrible for grocery shopping, night driving and poor weather conditions. If it rains where you live, the motorcycle will be really dangerous.
Be kind to everyone.
Never stop learning 
I bought a used 1d2n recently. It does a lot of the stuff that a used 7d does at under half the price. I liked the crop factor more and it's built like a tank.  As [someone](http://www.reddit.com/user/PatrickMorris) said when I asked reddit if it was a good idea "Turns out they still take the same level of quality images that they did five years ago when we all fawned over them"
I'd honestly rather spend mine on someone special to me :(
Here in Utah we call it a McBitchin.
So, what? You wad it up and stuff it in their mouth so they can't cry?
Damn, that's fucked up. You're a pastor, why do you only give God 10%? Haha. IDK, that was the funniest to me. Oh, religious people.
I see! I won't pretend to understand serious depression, because I certainly don't think I do.   However, I still do recommend trying a little bit of meditation- smiling optional (I do think it helps- the smile doesn't even have to be genuine. It could be the dumbest, most faked, angriest, or saddest smile ever.)   It's a solitary exercise, and no one's going to be there to tell you anything but yourself. It does take practice, too. If you start feeling overwhelmed and forced to focus on something you'd rather not, take a break. Or ask why. Get down to the heart of it.   Then again, I'm just some dude on the internet. I have no psychology or psychiatry training, and my experience with depression has been very limited. I do wish you the best, though. :) And- if you ever do need someone to talk to, I'm here, and all of reddit is as well. 
Oh ok, I didn't realize those had soundcards in them...Good to know!
He mentioned something in there about looting items from dead bodies (gravelooting). That was taken out over a year ago. Why would he think that was possible now?
I'm from the South, and white trash girls do have a certain look. I don't just mean with makeup and clothing, though too much black eyeliner and a too-small camisole as a shirt are dead giveaways; there really is something about the facial structure that you can just tell. Cara from that Buckwild show is an example (ignore the airbrushed modeling shots if you search google images).
Really? It's super pink for me, must be a monitor difference or something. Thank you! c:
And upvote to you sir
Nice!  If it is anything like my AL390 you will really love it.  Bought mine 20 years ago and still my go-to shotgun!
I hear ya talkin
You wouldn't!
You could still be considered a nut for taking method acting this seriously.
Maybe for an episode of Tosh.0, but not for Spongebob. 
Yeah but as someone with an aging Atrix running a gimped Cyanogenmod (my GSIII got stolen), it's not nearly the same. I don't know how life is on the Captivate, but there are a lot of compatibility problems and issues on my CM10.1 branched build.   On a Nexus, you know it's going to be as damn near perfect as it can get. 
Ok, do dinosaurs exist to dogs?  Or to monkeys, or birds, or any other animal on earth? Of course not, as far as they are concerned they never existed.  They exist to humans because of our minds.  We see their bones and figured out what happened.  Without the mind and perception, then they're just rocks.  Kind of a tree falling in the woods sort of thing.
Drink tons of water, limit your carbs and red meat, eat tons of fruits and veggies (watch out for starchy veggies such as corn), exercise not just cardio but free weights. Sleep good limit sweets :) Good lUck :)
The mirror thing I think has more to do with small shards spreading throughout the room. Ie, even if you clean up really well, some small pieces will probably escape your broom. Several years later out of nowhere you may step on some invisible sharp thing and start bleeding...bad luck.  This has happened to me after dropping ceramic plates.
Everyone benefits from welfare.  From an economic perspective, virtually all the money given out via welfare goes right back into the system.  It changes hands multiple times, and therefore provides an economic boost higher than what it costs.  It drives down crime, because people don't need to steal to eat.   It's not a pancea, however from a cost-benefit analysis, welfare programs are a no-brainer.  To say otherwise just goes against the need and desire of following evidence based practices.
Because there is no tolerated mistake here - that's why. There's you being wrong, and everyone else being right.   Never popular with your teachers or peers now, were you?
I want your room. 
I actually like it as is...I don't think it needs any cropping.  That negative space on the right really adds to the photo.
Anyone seeking more info might also check here:  title | comnts | points | age | /r/ :--|:--|:--|:--|:-- [The pistachio worm strikes again...I was inches away from eating this little guy](http://www.reddit.com/r/WTF/comments/17n1zb/the_pistachio_worm_strikes_againi_was_inches_away/) | 1^com | -2^pts | 6^hrs | WTF  *[source: karmadecay](http://karmadecay.com/i.imgur.com/GDiGbHq.jpg)*
Seriously... to me, Dubai *is* the future. When I was a kid, and you asked me what a 22nd century skyline would look like, Dubai would have been the perfect example. 
Hell ya we got dogs for our ATVs that is pretty boss. 
Already have ICS on mine... It doesn't run the best.
Narwhals.   Seriously. 'Unicorns of the sea'? Who falls for that?
Springfield, revolver type pistol, or a new Lmg. I doubt they would add a secondary 
Original: http://www.reddit.com/r/videos/comments/17n18r/atlanta_security_guard_with_some_balls_running/  Same video in my mind...
It's cool, but the bird is supposed to be red...
I'm not calling for drastic action, I'm basically a lurker.  But I saw your comment, Saw his username, and saw the articles author.  I just think self plugging is silly. That said, I think your decision is reasonable. 
Gotcha.  Thanks!  I've never done that one, both for lack of want to be cured and for lack of need.
That went better then expected.
I read this in Patrick Bateman's voice nervous an axe was about to swing
The fact that we are at 1.4.7.
I supply the 50 inch, and I can confirm that he sits on it.
I would love you to create one. I just opened up the ClopficWeekly reddit, and I'm looking for some good contributions. Let me know if you wanna help. It has to have comedy.
I came here for the balls comments. Thank you.
&gt;If only it were real syrup and not just an odor.   It is for Canadians.
She's from the Lance Armstrong School of Apologies: she's only sorry she got caught.
and history should have a search option
When it starts over and you see how normal he looks, awesome
''ERRRRRRM''
The Matrix is fiction. LSD and other pshycoactives produce an altered state of mind by interfering with its normal operation, not by "revealing reality" or some other nonsense. What's your point? 
I'm like....30ish minutes from Dublin.  They have a better Babies R Us than we do.
It used to be a "Core Value" @ Mindspring:  "In all things, we do what we say we are going to do."
and 9/11 was a hologram.  -lil B
Damn it. I've been wearing onesies for like 4-5 years now. I found glow-in-the-dark dinosaur onesies at Target when I was still in college and had to buy it. My most recent onesie has a hood with eyes and teeth and is designed to make me look like a monster. I'm 25, and apparently just as cool as New Zealand teenagers.  Edit: example [album](http://imgur.com/a/FiABz) of my swell onesies.
I'm willing to take you up on that bet. How much money do you have?
First of all if your device was power cycling I hope you took it into a repair location and did not pay Asurion $100. Sprint runs a buyout program there are 2 ways to find out if you are eligible 1) go into a corporate store not an authorized retailer or 2) call Customer Care (*2 from your Sprint phone) and get transferred to the retention department. If you aren't happy with the options Sprint offers you I'd recommend contacting someone selling an iPhone on Craigslist and having them meet you at the Sprint store so the rep can check the ESN. You can then sell your phone on Craigslist to offset some of the cost of the iPhone.  
3 t-shirts and a blind bag Rarity.  Yeah I don't have much.
I've been trying to figure it out since the episode aired. Some notes are pretty similar to the Equation song, just at a different tempo.  Other than that, no dice.
Thanks bro
Looks good. Awesome domain. Why do I need to use it? I'm not given a reason. 
I didn't read that AMA, but there is a very interesting documentary that was made by the BBC (Horizon possibly?) a few years ago called The Man Who Injects Venom. Venom injections might not be an elixir, but they have made the test subjects immune system incredibly strong. 
... Well, scratch Hawaii off the list of places I'll ever go. T_T
Right it's 50% more, but they increase the price.
Married at 21, what are you mormon? Oh wait gin.
Meh, I didn't see anything that cringe worthy. Looked like good times. 
not interested
Canada for one. I lost the tips of two fingers 6 months ago...the only cost was for painkillers, which I didn't use anyway.
Probably works just about as well as hanging fucking magnets around your neck.
Well, I do own a couple Macs, but it's mostly because I'm a graphic designer. Good design matters.
Looked up the distance, it's 4 :(. But at least I can retract the previous statement and say about 250 miles :]
And my point being, thats the totaly wrong approach. People does not need or want to give it time, because something better already excists. Is that really so hard to understand?  Tell your "friend" that!
&gt;Do you think it's rude to give advice on someone's form?  Yes. 
That kinda makes me sad
This woman is a cunt.  "I give 10% to God."  "Demaded everyone be fired, from the servers to the managers. " Doesn't seem very Christian. 
D:
My sequence "Nice balls. Old chair. Nice carpet. Hey that dog's missing a head."  
...The States' prison system scares me  If this isn't the states, then I'm even more scared
Failing that you'll need to upgrade your CPU. Are you using a laptop or a PC?
Way more viable than position 1. You need at least another autoattacking carry to make the best use of his Ult. Troll with a Wisp+Tiny combo is just ridiculous.  We will have to wait for CM pool update (which is very delayed).
Such a lovely bottom
Invest in microsoft. Stay away from corey and darron. If you don't believe Me april 18th. Yeah only you know. Tell your dad you love him often.
Yeah, I have a whole craft wishlist if you wanna check it out
If he is high all the time, how can you tell that he is different from when he is sober, you need a baseline before you can establish if there is a change. Your baseline (and it seems like everyone else's) is him high, so you wouldnt be able to tell.
The picture was taken 3 years after the questions were asked, and it might have been a few since the picture was taken. So, yeah.
Rape.  As the giver or receiver. I imagine anything with a conscience/soul/empathy would feel just as bad doing the raping as those being raped.
Yes, it makes it so that she's always either too good or useless.  Jokes aside, she's had like 4 or 5 different passives over the years, it's kinda silly. 
FROGGEN STAPH
Here's a picture of me when I was younger
If you havent hear of it there is a very similar concept in statistical mechanics called the random walk experiment that does exactly that...heads being a step to the right and tails the left...whats more is that when ypu start graphing these steps they start looking like trees!!! Holy shit mindfuck 
relevant username? ^
Nothing. You know what is best in life? To crush your enemies, see them driven before you, and to hear the lamentation of their women. Try buying that shit.
Is the grille plasti-dip or just flat black paint?
Pocket billiards.  I play 9-ball four to six days a week and have been getting much better.  It'd be nice to be on the pro level though.  I guess that is what practice is for.
Whatt? Your first three are literally some of my favorite blink songs ever...But I agree with your TOYPAJ selection and definitely Neighborhoods....
Here is a graph of what the project has raised:             G|             |40K             |             |             |30K             |             |             |20K             |             |10K             |    oooooooooooooooooooo    |  ooo           |0  --------------------------------------  1/6   1/14  1/21   1/29  2/5   2/13  2/20  [Click to see full graph](http://canhekick.it/projects/320792163/the-coleridge-design-acube-bmr-speaker-system) [FAQ](http://canhekick.it/reddit-faq)
See my comment above. I would hate for the government to decide what the most appropriate option is for me. These options simply don't work for everyone, and I should have the right to weigh these risks against the benefits. BTW, IUD is not a fail safe - I know two women who had ectopic pregnancies and almost died because of these devices. Doctors should counsel women - not politicians.
Mind your own business.
-takes a step backwards-
"If there nice to you but mean to the waiter they're not a nice person."
I have a weirder fetish than that. I have a hot bleach-blonde girl fetish. Don't judge me!
NO MAN EVERYONE LEAGUE COMMUNITY DEMONS MAN
Work hard, be honest, question authority.
So is this a new type of LCD controller for the Wii? Why the heck it is so pricy. PS3 controller is $40.
Apparently.  I looked at it earlier, and everything included in it seemed like a temporary boost. 
I have the same problem with my Border Collie pup. She licks like mad nonstop while I'm trying to brush.
I agree that there are technologies that are now in their infancy that in the future could allow for a symbiosis and a balance of human life on the landbase.  That being said, it's still the question of whether or not those technologies would be centralized, like all other utilities, or be decentralized. My guess is that as soon as Oil and gas are no longer profitable/feasible as an energy source, we will have "solar and wind barons" take their place. They will build centrallized solar farms, and transmit the power over the lines similar to what we have now.  But does that not protect the current power structures?  Won't the people that are rich now be the ones that still hold onto the "means of production", since they will be the ones with investment capital to dominate these new forms of energy and utility?  I think the problems we face need to be faced on a local level.  Derrick Jensen, while dire in his forecast of human progress, addresses some key issues that I believe you are dismissing too easily. Going back to simpler processes, and decentralized production of necessities not only re-builds community structures, it also makes humans appreciate their landbase again.  And I'm sure you will agree that without a habitable landbase, we have zero chance of survival as a species.  Just because factory farming exists, does that make it the most "efficient" way of farming?  Is it the most sustainable long-term?  Does the distance between how our food is produced make us respect our environment more or less?  I would clearly argue that people that don't see land as a means for personal sustenance, will see it as a resource to be exploited.  And people who don't farm their own land, and require monies to purchase food will be more willing to destroy their landbase inorder to acquire the monies. (People who allow fracking on their properties for example).  Technology is not always a good thing.  The best quote from his book, Endgame, is something to the effect of (paraphrase, sorry at work) "Our great grandchildren won't be impressed by our iphones, or our cars, or our internet.  They will be angry when they go to catch a fish, and there are none.  They will be angrier when they go to drink the water, and it is tainted." Our basic needs have not evolved with technology.  If anything, technology has alienated us from our most basic of skills and needs. It's not about "returning to the 1800s"  Its about realizing that we are not all that different from people back then.  The main difference is that most of us are no longer able to survive without the processes in place that are killing off the planet.
I've seen you lurkers handiwork! It's usually not pretty and neither are the left over user bits! Lurkers are a mean and viscious lot! /s
The blood ritual shall begin once the Belichick has acquired his 6th ring.
That's what I meant by voiding the check - a stop payment - so sue me.
Oh geez. I was going through my stash of super old makeup this past weekend and ran across the body glitter I wore to prom...in 2002.
Almost 50%?!   I didn't realize that carmelo was so clutch.
I love that the camera is called a "hero."
That's just immaturity.
I don't want a demo, and there won't be a demo.
RES baby.
not to mention the lifetime warranty on leatherman. my dad bought a super tool when i was a kid, hes no on his third one because he literally wears the thing on his belt every day and things wear and break, but he hasn't payed for one since the first. i now own a wave and it lives in my every day carry backpack. would be lost without it.
I just tell my guy that he makes a great first husband. :)
&gt; What is it about orgies that the Illuminati love?  ...  ...  ...  I couldn't even *begin* to guess.
Short &amp; sweet. Seemed like you were after the peak of your session though. I think it would be interesting if you had say, other grape flavors you would compare it to.
And when you do you're suddenly a dick
1. These are harder to read than l337.  Edit1: 7h353 4r3 h4rd3r 70 r34d 7h4n l337  Edit2:  7|-|353 r |-|4RD3R 70 r34D 7|-|4|/| L337
Sounds like something straight out of the Sims
I am aware of it having to go through the carrier after the manufacturer has completed a software update but what I'm pointing it is that HTC flat out said "Android 4.0 has been canceled" after it originally stated the Thunderbolt would be receiving it.   Just odd that they would state "canceled" if they really did have it ready and it was just waiting for approval on Verizon. 
just read through the whole comic, and what she had of soul silver done, jeez it was good
Aal is well -Rancho
What mods are you running
I would like to see how a typical composition team fares against 5 bruisers just for science.
he speaks the truth majesty
that is a hate filled racist misogynistic comment  
Hey man, lesbians have sex all the time and they don't have penises.
&gt; The entire point of Fear and Trembling is to point out that some things can never be certain, that we have to choose anyway.  Yes, one of the central ideas of Kierkegaard and Sartre (and all existentialists for that matter) is freedom of choice.  I agree that 100% convincing is not possible (not withstanding Divine intervention -__-) and I may have exaggerated a little by using the number. But the question is about your own personal choice.  What would convince you to obey the order?
In Bioshock the hacking/lockpicking was basically to complete a level of Pipe Dreams in order to open or hack whatever thing you were hacking/lockpicking.
[ok](http://i.imgur.com/gwVLi.gif) 
This is England. 
this pisses me off
I think most creation biologists believe it evolved from SIV, same as everyone else?
This is so mind blowing . Can't believe I didn't think of this before. Take two party food items (potato skins and buffalo chicken dip) and mash them together into one. Thanks for sharing!
The Queazy Bake Oven.
Proof that the pics *are* WTF?
[](/ajheart) That would have to be Aqua from Kingdom Hearts.  [](/lunalove) I also have a raging mancrush on Auron.
Because culturally when a husband and wife are living together and both working, usually the mother is the one who stays home and deals with the kids? A single mother does not have that option so single mother will usually make more than their married counterparts.
To that I can reply, stop dropping your pistol in dirt, sand, or water and maybe you won't need a glock.  I kid, I don't have a problem with Glocks I just have an attraction to stainless guns, just my preference. 
I am indeed lucky! That's too bad that someone else told your parents and not you, it's your business anyways.  I hope you can get your things back when you move out so you can have a sense of peace. I wish you the best of luck fellow Ent!
